 The Disillusioned Liberals As a result of the depression and rising criticism of postwar activist government, a revolt emerged in the Republican Party. It was led by influential intellectuals, journalists, and businessmen who believed in classical liberalism: free trade, small government, low property taxes, and limitation of voting rights to men of education and property. Liberals responded to the massive increase in federal power, during the Civil War and Reconstruction, by urging a policy of laissez faire, in which government “let alone” business and the economy. In the postwar decades, laissez faire advocates never succeeded in ending federal policies such as the protective tariff and national banking system (Chapter 16), but their arguments helped roll back Reconstruction. Unable to block Grant’s renomination for the presidency in 1872, the dissidents broke away and formed a new party under the name Liberal Republican. Their candidate was Horace Greeley, longtime publisher of the New York Tribune and veteran reformer and abolitionist. The Democrats, still in disarray, also nominated Greeley, notwithstanding his editorial diatribes against them. A poor campaigner, Greeley was assailed so severely that, as he said, “I hardly knew whether I was running for the Presidency or the penitentiary.” Grant won reelection overwhelmingly, capturing 56 percent of the popular vote and every electoral vote. Yet Liberal Republicans had shifted the terms of debate. The agenda they advanced — smaller government, restricted voting rights, and reconciliation with ex-Confederates — resonated with Democrats, who had long advocated limited government and were working to reclaim their status as a legitimate national party. Liberalism thus crossed party lines, uniting disillusioned conservative Republicans UNDERSTAND with Democrats who denounced POINTS OF VIEW government activism. E. L. Godkin How did ex-Confederates, of The Nation and other classical freedpeople, Republicans, liberal editors played key roles and classical liberals view in turning northern public opinthe end of Reconstruction? ion against Reconstruction. With

 unabashed elitism, Godkin and others claimed that freedmen were unfit to vote. They denounced universal suffrage, which “can only mean in plain English the government of ignorance and vice.” The second Grant administration gave liberals plenty of ammunition. The most notorious scandal involved Crédit Mobilier, a sham corporation set up by shareholders in the Union Pacific Railroad to secure government grants at an enormous profit. Organizers of the scheme protected it from investigation by providing gifts of Crédit Mobilier stock to powerful members of Congress. Another scandal involved the Whiskey Ring, a network of liquor distillers and treasury agents who defrauded the government of millions of dollars of excise taxes on whiskey. The ringleader was Grant’s private secretary, Orville Babcock. Others went to prison, but Grant stood by Babcock, possibly perjuring himself to save his secretary from jail. The stench of scandal permeated the White House.

Counterrevolution in the South
 While northerners became preoccupied with scandals and the shock of economic depression, ex-Confederates seized power in the South. Most believed (as northern liberals had also begun to argue) that southern Reconstruction governments were illegitimate “regimes.” Led by the planters, ex-Confederates staged a massive insurgency to take back the South. When they could win at the ballot box, southern Democrats took that route. They got ex-Confederate voting rights restored and campaigned against “negro rule.” But when force was necessary, southern Democrats used it. Present-day Americans, witnessing political violence in other countries, seldom remember that our own history includes the overthrow of elected governments by paramilitary groups. But this is exactly how Reconstruction ended in many parts of the South. Ex-Confederates terrorized Republicans, especially in districts with large proportions of black voters. Black political leaders were shot, hanged, beaten to death, and in one case even beheaded. Many Republicans, both black and white, went into hiding or fled for their lives. Southern Democrats called this violent process “Redemption” — a heroic name that still sticks today, even though this seizure of power was murderous and undemocratic. No one looms larger in this bloody story than Nathan Bedford Forrest, a decorated Confederate general. Born in poverty in 1821, Forrest had risen to become a big-time slave trader and Mississippi planter. A fiery secessionist, Forrest had formed a Tennessee

 CHAPTER 15

 Confederate cavalry regiment, fought bravely at the battle of Shiloh, and won fame as a daring raider. On April 12, 1864, his troops perpetrated one of the war’s worst atrocities, the massacre at Fort Pillow, Tennessee, of black Union soldiers who were trying to surrender. After the Civil War, Forrest’s determination to uphold white supremacy altered the course of Reconstruction. William G. Brownlow, elected as Tennessee’s Republican governor in 1865, was a tough man, a former prisoner of the Confederates who was not shy about calling his enemies to account. Ex-Confederates struck back with a campaign of terror, targeting especially Brownlow’s black supporters. Amid the mayhem, ex-Confederates formed the first Ku Klux Klan group in late 1865 or early 1866. As it proliferated across the state, the Klan turned to Forrest, who had been trying, unsuccessfully, to rebuild his prewar fortune. Late in 1866, at a secret meeting in Nashville, Forrest donned the robes of Grand Wizard. His activities are mostly cloaked in mystery, but there is no mistake about his goals: the Klan would strike blows against the despised Republican government of Tennessee. In many towns, the Klan became virtually identical to the Democratic Party. Klan members — including Forrest — dominated Tennessee’s delegation to the Democratic national convention of 1868. At home, the Klan unleashed a murderous campaign of terror, and though Governor Brownlow responded resolutely, in the end Republicans cracked. The Klan and similar groups — organized under such names as the White League and Knights of the White Camelia — arose in other states. Vigilantes burned freedmen’s schools, beat teachers, attacked Republican gatherings, and murdered political opponents. By 1870, Democrats had seized power in Georgia and North Carolina and were making headway across the South. Once they took power, they slashed property taxes and passed other laws favorable to landowners. They terminated Reconstruction programs and cut funding for schools, especially those teaching black students. In responding to the Klan between 1869 and 1871, the federal government showed it could still exert power effectively in the South. Determined to end Klan violence, Congress held extensive hearings and in 1870 passed laws designed to protect freedmen’s rights under the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments. These so-called Enforcement Laws authorized federal prosecutions, military intervention, and martial law to suppress terrorist activity. Grant’s administration made full use of these new powers. In South Carolina, where the Klan was deeply entrenched, U.S. troops occupied

Reconstruction, 1865–1877


Ku Klux Klan Mask
 White supremacists of the 1870s organized under many names and wore many costumes, not simply (or often) the white cone-shaped hats that were made famous later, in the 1920s, when the Klan underwent a nationwide resurgence. Few masks from the 1870s have survived. The horns and fangs on this one, from North Carolina, suggest how Klan members sought to strike terror in their victims, while also hiding their own identities. North Carolina Museum of History.

 nine counties, made hundreds of arrests, and drove as many as 2,000 Klansmen from the state. This assault on the Klan, while raising the spirits of southern Republicans, revealed how dependent they were on Washington. “No such law could be enforced by state authority,” one Mississippi Republican observed, “the local power being too weak.” But northern Republicans were growing disillusioned with Reconstruction, while in the South, prosecuting Klansmen was an uphill battle against all-white juries and unsympathetic federal judges. After 1872, prosecutions dropped off. In the meantime, the Texas government fell to the Democrats in 1873 and Alabama and Arkansas in 1874.

Reconstruction Rolled Back
 As divided Republicans debated how to respond, voters in the congressional election of 1874 handed them one of the most stunning defeats of the nineteenth century. Responding especially to the severe depression that gripped the nation, they removed almost half of the party’s 199 representatives in the House. Democrats, who had held 88 seats, now commanded an overwhelming majority of 182. “The election is not merely





 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

 a victory but a revolution,” exulted a Democratic newspaper in New York. After 1874, with Democrats in control of the House, Republicans who tried to shore up their southern wing had limited options. Bowing to election results, the Grant administration began to reject southern Republicans’ appeals for aid. Events in Mississippi showed the outcome. As state elections neared there in 1875, paramilitary groups such as the Red Shirts operated openly. Mississippi’s Republican governor, Adelbert Ames, a Union veteran from Maine, appealed for U.S. troops, but Grant refused. “The whole public are tired out with these annual autumnal outbreaks in the South,” complained a Grant official, who told southern Republicans that they were responsible for their own fate. Facing a rising tide of brutal murders, Governor Ames — realizing that only further bloodshed could result — urged his allies to give up the fight. Brandishing guns and stuffing ballot boxes, Democratic “Redeemers” swept the 1875 elections and took control of Mississippi. By 1876, Reconstruction was largely over. Republican governments, backed by token U.S. military units, remained in only three southern states: Louisiana, South Carolina, and Florida. Elsewhere, former Confederates and their allies took power.

The Supreme Court Rejects Equal Rights Though
 ex-Confederates seized power in southern states, new landmark constitutional amendments and federal laws remained in force. If the Supreme Court had left these intact, subsequent generations of civil rights advocates could have used the federal courts to combat racial discrimination and violence. Instead, the Court closed off this avenue for the pursuit of justice, just as it dashed the hopes of women’s rights advocates. As early as 1873, in a group of decisions known collectively as the Slaughter-House Cases, the Court began to undercut the power of the Fourteenth Amendment. In this case and a related ruling, U.S. v. Cruikshank (1876), the justices argued that the Fourteenth Amendment offered only a few, rather trivial federal protections to citizens (such as access to navigable waterways). In Cruikshank — a case that emerged from a gruesome killing of African American farmers by ex-Confederates in Colfax, Louisiana, followed by a Democratic political coup — the Court ruled that voting rights remained a state matter unless the state itself violated those rights. If former slaves’ rights were violated by individuals or private groups (including the Klan), that lay beyond federal jurisdiction. The Fourteenth Amendment did not protect citizens from armed vigilantes, even when those vigilantes seized

 political power. The Court thus gutted the Fourteenth Amendment. In the Civil Rights Cases (1883), the justices also struck down the Civil Rights Act of 1875, paving the way for later decisions that sanctioned segregation. The impact of these decisions endured well into the twentieth century.

 The Political Crisis of 1877 After the grim election results of 1874, Republicans faced a major battle in the presidential election of 1876. Abandoning Grant, they nominated Rutherford B. Hayes, a former Union general who was untainted by corruption and — even more important — hailed from the key swing state of Ohio. Hayes’s Democratic opponent was New York governor Samuel J. Tilden, a Wall Street lawyer with a reform reputation. Tilden favored home rule for the South, but so, more discreetly, did Hayes. With enforcement on the wane, Reconstruction did not figure prominently in the campaign, and little was said about the states still led by Reconstruction governments: Florida, South Carolina, and Louisiana. Once returns started coming in on election night, however, those states loomed large. Tilden led in the popular vote and seemed headed for victory until sleepless politicians at Republican headquarters realized that the electoral vote stood at 184 to 165, with the 20 votes from Florida, South Carolina, and Louisiana still uncertain. If Hayes took those votes, he would win by a margin of 1. Citing ample evidence of Democratic fraud and intimidation, Republican officials certified all three states for Hayes. “Redeemer” Democrats who had taken over the states’ governments submitted their own electoral votes for Tilden. When Congress met in early 1877, it confronted two sets of electoral votes from those states. The Constitution does not provide for such a contingency. All it says is that the president of the Senate (in 1877, a Republican) opens the electoral certificates before the House (Democratic) and the Senate (Republican) and “the Votes shall then be counted” (Article 2, Section 1). Suspense gripped the country. There was talk of inside deals or a new election — even a violent coup. Finally, Congress appointed an electoral commission to settle the question. The commission included seven Republicans, seven Democrats, and, as the deciding member, David Davis, a Supreme Court justice not known to have fixed party loyalties. Davis, however, disqualified himself by accepting an Illinois Senate seat. He was replaced by Republican justice Joseph P. Bradley, and by a vote of 8 to 7, on party lines, the commission awarded the election to Hayes. In the House of Representatives, outraged Democrats vowed to stall the final count of electoral votes so

 CHAPTER 15

Reconstruction, 1865–1877


“Grantism”
 President Grant was lampooned on both sides of the Atlantic for the problems of his scandal-ridden administration. The British magazine Puck shows Grant barely defying gravity to keep himself and his corrupt subordinates aloft and out of jail. To a great extent, however, the hero of the Union army remained personally popular at home and abroad. The British public welcomed Grant with admiration on his triumphant foreign tour in 1877. Library of Congress.

 as to prevent Hayes’s inauguration on March 4. But in the end, they went along — partly because Tilden himself urged that they do so. Hayes had publicly indicated his desire to offer substantial patronage to the South, including federal funds for education and internal improvements. He promised “a complete change of men and policy” — naively hoping, at the same time, that he could count on support from old-line southern Whigs and protect black voting rights. Hayes was inaugurated on schedule. He expressed hope in his inaugural address that the federal government could serve “the interests of both races carefully and equally.” But,

 setting aside the U.S. troops who were serving on border duty in Texas, only 3,000 Union soldiers remained in the South. As soon as the new president ordered them back to their barracks, the last Republican administrations in the South collapsed. Reconstruction had ended.

Lasting Legacies
 In the short run, the political events of 1877 had little impact on most southerners. Much of the work of “Redemption” had already been done. What mattered



THINKING LIKE A HISTORIAN
The South’s “Lost Cause” 
 After Reconstruction ended, many white southerners celebrated the Confederacy as a heroic “Lost Cause.” Through organizations such as the Sons of Confederate Veterans and United Daughters of the Confederacy, they profoundly influenced the nation’s memories of slavery, the Civil War, and Reconstruction.

 1. Commemorative postcard of living Confederate flag, Robert E. Lee Monument, Richmond, Virginia, 1907. An estimated 150,000 people gathered in 1890 to dedicate this statue — ten times more than had attended earlier memorial events.

Source: The Library of Virginia.


2. From the United Daughters of the Confederacy
Constitution, 1894. The United Daughters of the
 Confederacy (UDC), founded in 1894, grew in three years to 136 chapters and by the late 1910s counted a membership of 100,000.

 and the glorious cause for which they fought; to cherish the ties of friendship among members of this Association; to endeavor to have used in all Southern schools only such histories as are just and true.

 The objects of this association are historical, educational, memorial, benevolent, and social: To fulfill the duties of sacred charity to the survivors of the war and those dependent on them; to collect and preserve material for a truthful history of the war; to protect historic places of the Confederacy; to record the part taken by the Southern women . . . in patient endurance of hardship and patriotic devotion during the struggle; to perpetuate the memory of our Confederate heroes

 3. McNeel Marble Co. advertisement in Confederate Veteran magazine, 1905.



 To the Daughters of the Confederacy: In regard to that Confederate monument which your Chapter has been talking about and planning for since you first got organized. Why not buy it NOW and have it erected before all the old veterans have answered the final roll call? Why wait and worry about raising funds? Our terms to U.D.C. Chapters are so liberal and our plans for raising funds

 are so effective as to obviate the necessity of either waiting or worrying. During the last three or four years we have sold Confederate monuments to thirty-seven of your sister Chapters. . . . Our designs, our prices, our work, our business methods have pleased them, and we can please you. What your sister Chapters have done, you can do. . . . WRITE TO-DAY. 4. Confederate veteran’s letter, Confederate Veteran magazine, 1910. An anonymous Georgian who had served in Lee’s army sent the following letter to the veterans’ magazine after attending a reunion in Memphis.

 Reunion gatherings are supposed to be for the benefit of the old veterans; but will you show us where the privates, the men who stood the hardships and did the fighting, have any consideration when they get to the city that is expected to entertain them? . . . [In Memphis, I] stopped at the school building, where there were at least twenty-five or thirty old veterans lying on the ground, and had been there all night. All this while the officers were being banqueted, wined, dined, and quartered in the very best hotels; but the private must shift for himself, stand around on the street, or sit on the curbstone. He must march if he is able, but the officers ride in fine carriages. Pay more attention to the men of the ranks — men who did service! I always go prepared to pay my way; but I do not like to be ignored. 5. Matthew Page Andrews, The Women of the South in War Times, 1923. Matthew Page Andrews’s The Women of the South in War Times, approved by the UDC, was a popular textbook for decades in schools throughout the South.

 The Southern people of the “old regime” have been pictured as engaged primarily in a protracted struggle for the maintenance of negro slavery. . . . Fighting on behalf of slavery was as far from the minds of these Americans as going to war in order to free the slaves was from the purpose of Abraham Lincoln, whose sole object, frequently expressed by him, was to “preserve the Union.” . . . That, in the midst of war, there were almost no instances of arson, murder, or outrage committed by the ANALYZING THE EVIDENCE 1. What do sources 2 and 3 tell us about the work of local UDC chapters? What does the advertisement suggest about the economy of the postwar South? 2. What can you infer from these sources about the situation in the South after the Civil War? Why might women have played a particularly important role in memorial associations? 3. Compare and contrast sources 4 and 6. Who did “Lost Cause” associations serve, and how is this connected to issues of class and race?

 negroes of the South is an everlasting tribute to the splendid character of the dominant race and their moral uplift of a weaker one. . . . When these negroes were landed on American shores, almost all were savages taken from the lowest forms of jungle life. It was largely the women of the South who trained these heathen people, molded their characters, and, in the second and third generations, lifted them up a thousand years in the scale of civilization. 6. Susie King Taylor, Reminiscences of My Life in Camp with the 33d United States Colored Troops, Late 1st S.C. Volunteers, 1902. Susie King Taylor, born in slavery in Georgia in 1848, fled with her uncle during the Civil War and served as a nurse in the Union army.

 I read an article, which said the ex-Confederate Daughters had sent a petition to the managers of the local theatres in Tennessee to prohibit the performance of “Uncle Tom’s Cabin,” claiming it was exaggerated (that is, the treatment of the slaves), and would have a very bad effect on the children who might see the drama. I paused and thought back a few years of the heart-rending scenes I have witnessed. . . . I remember, as if it were yesterday, seeing droves of negroes going to be sold, and I often went to look at them, and I could hear the auctioneer very plainly from my house, auctioning these poor people off. Do these Confederate Daughters ever send petitions to prohibit the atrocious lynchings and wholesale murdering and torture of the negro? Do you ever hear of them fearing this would have a bad effect on the children? Which of these two, the drama or the present state of affairs, makes a degrading impression upon the minds of our young generation? In my opinion it is not “Uncle Tom’s Cabin.” . . . It does not seem as if our land is yet civilized. Sources: (2) Minutes of the Seventh Annual Meeting of the United Daughters of the Confederacy (Nashville, TN.: Press of Foster & Webb, Printers, 1901), 235; (3) Confederate Veteran, 1905; (4) Confederate Veteran, Vol. XVIII (Nashville, TN.: S. A. Cunningham, 1910); (5) Matthew Page Andrews, ed., The Women of the South in War Times (Baltimore: The Norman, Remington Co., 1923), 3–4, 9–10; (6) Susie King Taylor, Reminiscences of My Life in Camp (Boston: Published by the author, 1902), 65–66.

 4. How does source 5 depict slaves? Slaveholders? Is this an accurate account of the history of the South, and how does this compare to source 4? What do these different interpretations suggest about the legacy of “Redemption”?

PUTTING IT ALL TOGETHER
“Lost Cause” advocates often stated that their work was not political. To what extent was this true, based on the evidence here? What do these documents suggest about the influence of the Lost Cause, and also the limitations and challenges it faced? What do they tell us about the legacies of Reconstruction more broadly? 




 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

 was the long, slow decline of Radical Republican power and the corresponding rise of Democrats in the South and nationally. It was obvious that so-called Redeemers in the South had assumed power through violence. But many Americans — including prominent classical liberals who shaped public opinion — believed the Democrats had overthrown corrupt, illegitimate governments; thus the end justified the means. After 1874, those who deplored the results had little political traction. The only remaining question was how far Reconstruction would be rolled back. The South never went back to the antebellum status quo. Sharecropping, for all its flaws and injustices, was not slavery. Freedmen and freedwomen managed to resist gang labor and work on their own terms. They also established their right to marry, read and write, worship as they pleased, and travel in search of a better life — rights that were not easily revoked. Across the South, black farmers overcame great odds to buy and work their own land. African American businessmen built thriving enterprises. Black churches and community groups sustained networks of mutual aid. Parents sacrificed to send their children to school, and a few proudly watched their sons and daughters graduate from college. Reconstruction had also shaken, if not fully overturned, the legal and political framework that had made the United States a white man’s country. This was a stunning achievement, and though hostile courts and political opponents undercut it, no one ever repealed the Thirteenth, Fourteenth, and Fifteenth Amendments. They remained in the Constitution, and the civil rights movement of the twentieth century would return and build on this framework (Chapter 26). Still, in the final reckoning, Reconstruction failed. The majority of freedpeople remained in poverty, and by the late 1870s their political rights were also eroding. Vocal advocates of smaller government argued that Reconstruction had been a mistake; pressured by economic hardship, northern voters abandoned their southern Unionist allies. One of the enduring legacies of this process was the way later Americans remembered Reconstruction itself. After “Redemption,” generations of schoolchildren were taught that ignorant, lazy blacks and corrupt whites had imposed illegitimate Reconstruction “regimes” on the South. White southerners won national support for their celebration of a heroic Confederacy (Thinking Like a Historian, p. 502). One of the first historians to challenge these views was the great African American intellectual W. E. B. Du Bois. In Black Reconstruction in America (1935),

 Du Bois meticulously documented the history of African American struggle, white vigilante violence, and national policy failure. If Reconstruction, he wrote, “had been conceived as a major national program . . . whose accomplishment at any price was well worth the effort, we should be living today in a different world.” His words still ring true, but in 1935 historians ignored him. Not a single scholarly journal reviewed Du Bois’s important book. Ex-Confederates had lost the war, but they won control over the nation’s memory of Reconstruction. Meanwhile, though their programs failed in the South, Republicans carried their nation-building project into the West, where their policies helped consolidate a continental empire. There, the federal power that had secured emancipation created the conditions for the United States to become an industrial power and a major leader on the world stage.

SUMMARY
Postwar Republicans faced two tasks: restoring rebellious states to the Union and defining the role of emancipated slaves. After Lincoln’s assassination, his successor, Andrew Johnson, hostile to Congress, unilaterally offered the South easy terms for reentering the Union. Exploiting this opportunity, southerners adopted oppressive Black Codes and put ex-Confederates back in power. Congress impeached Johnson and, though failing to convict him, seized the initiative and placed the South under military rule. In this second, or radical, phase of Reconstruction, Republican state governments tried to transform the South’s economic and social institutions. Congress passed innovative civil rights acts and funded new agencies like the Freedmen’s Bureau. The Fourteenth Amendment defined U.S. citizenship and asserted that states could no longer supersede it, and the Fifteenth Amendment gave voting rights to formerly enslaved men. Debate over this amendment precipitated a split among women’s rights advocates, since women did not win inclusion. Freedmen found that their goals conflicted with those of Republican leaders, who counted on cotton to fuel economic growth. Like southern landowners, national lawmakers envisioned former slaves as wageworkers, while freedmen wanted their own land. Sharecropping, which satisfied no one completely, emerged as a compromise suited to the needs of the cotton market and an impoverished, credit-starved region. 
 CHAPTER 15

 Nothing could reconcile ex-Confederates to Republican government, and they staged a violent counterrevolution in the name of white supremacy and “Redemption.” Meanwhile, struck by a massive economic depression, northern voters handed Republicans a crushing defeat in the election of 1874. By 1876, Reconstruction was dead. Rutherford B. Hayes’s narrow

CHAPTER REVIEW

 victory in the presidential election of that year resulted in withdrawal of the last Union troops from the South. A series of Supreme Court decisions also undermined the Fourteenth Amendment and civil rights laws, setting up legal parameters through which, over the long term, disenfranchisement and segregation would flourish.

C H A P T E R


R E V I E W


M A K E I T S T I C K
Go to LearningCurve to retain what you’ve read. 
TERMS TO KNOW

 Identify and explain the significance of each term below.

Key Concepts and Events
Ten Percent Plan (p. 480)
Wade-Davis Bill (p. 480)
Black Codes (p. 481)
 Freedmen’s Bureau (p. 481) Civil Rights Act of 1866 (p. 481) Fourteenth Amendment (p. 481) Reconstruction Act of 1867 (p. 482) Fifteenth Amendment (p. 485) American Woman Suffrage Association (p. 486) National Woman Suffrage Association (p. 486) Minor v. Happersett (p. 486) sharecropping (p. 491) Union League (p. 493)

Key People
 scalawags (p. 493) carpetbaggers (p. 493) convict leasing (p. 495) Civil Rights Act of 1875 (p. 496) Freedman’s Savings and Trust Company (p. 497) classical liberalism (p. 498) laissez faire (p. 498) Crédit Mobilier (p. 498) “Redemption” (p. 498) Ku Klux Klan (p. 499) Enforcement Laws (p. 499) Slaughter-House Cases (p. 500) U.S. v. Cruikshank (p. 500) Civil Rights Cases (p. 500)

Andrew Johnson (p. 480)
Charles Sumner (p. 481)
Thaddeus Stevens (p. 482)
Ulysses S. Grant (p. 483)
Elizabeth Cady Stanton (p. 486)
Robert Smalls (p. 493)
Blanche K. Bruce (p. 494)
Nathan Bedford Forrest (p. 498)


REVIEW QUESTIONS
Answer these questions to demonstrate your understanding of the chapter’s main ideas. 
 1. How did U.S. presidents and Congress seek to rein-

 tegrate the Confederacy into the Union? What different approaches did they take, and what were the results?

 2. Compare the goals of Radical Republicans, freed-

 people, and ex-Confederates during Reconstruction. What conflicts ensued from their differing agendas?

 3. Why did Reconstruction falter? To what extent was

 its failure the result of events in the South, the North, and Washington, D.C.?

 4. Some of the language historians use to describe

 Reconstruction still reflects the point of view of exConfederates, who spoke of “Redemption.” What other names might we use for that process? What difference (if any) would it make if scholars called it something else?





 PART 5

CHAPTER REVIEW

 Look again at the events listed under “Politics and Power” and “Identity” on the thematic timeline on page 409. Some historians have argued that, during this era, the United States moved, politically and socially,

THEMATIC UNDERSTANDING

MAKING CONNECTIONS

 Recognize the larger developments and continuities within and across chapters by answering these questions.

ACROSS TIME AND PLACE
Ex-Confederates 
 were not the first Americans to engage in violent protest against what they saw as tyrannical government power. Imagine, for example, a conversation between a participant in Shays’s Rebellion (Chapter 6) and a southern Democrat who participated in the overthrow of a Republican government in his state. How would each describe his grievances? Who would he name as enemies? Compare and contrast the tactics of these and other violent protests against government power in the United States. To what extent did these groups succeed? Return to the image at the start of this chapter (p. 479), which shows a celebration in Baltimore after ratification of the Fifteenth Amendment. Note the distinguished African

VISUAL EVIDENCE

MORE TO EXPLORE

 from being a loose union of states to being a more unified and inclusive nation. To what extent do you agree? Use the events of Reconstruction as evidence in making your case.

 American heroes depicted at the top and the three scenes at the bottom. In the complete version of this popular lithograph, additional images appear on the left and right: black Union soldiers in battle; an African American minister preaching at an independent black church; a teacher and her students in a freedpeople’s school; an African American farmer in a wheat field; and a drawing of a proud black family on their farm with the caption “We till our own fields.” If a freedperson and a former slave owner had seen this image in 1870, how might each have responded? Imagine that an African American family had placed the picture in their home in 1870. How might they have reflected differently, twenty years later, on its significance?

 Start here to learn more about the events discussed in this chapter.

 American Social History Project, Freedom’s Unfinished Revolution (1996). A wonderful collection of images and eyewitness accounts. Philip Dray, Capitol Men (2008). A readable history of Reconstruction from the perspective of the first African American congressmen. Faye E. Dudden, Fighting Chance: The Struggle over Woman Suffrage and Black Suffrage in Reconstruction America (2011). A thoughtful exploration of the split among radical reformers. Eric Foner, A Short History of Reconstruction (1990). The best short overview of events in this decade, combining grassroots and political perspectives.

 Steven Hahn, A Nation Under Our Feet (2003). Hahn’s groundbreaking study of the rural South shows how African Americans’ strategies during Reconstruction were built on earlier experiences during slavery and the Civil War. Brooks D. Simpson, The Reconstruction Presidents (1998). A lively assessment of presidential politics from Lincoln through Hayes, full of entertaining quotations.

 CHAPTER 15

 TIMELINE

CHAPTER REVIEW

 Ask yourself why this chapter begins and ends with these dates and then identify the links among related events.



 Wade-Davis Bill passed by Congress but killed by Lincoln’s pocket veto



 Freedmen’s Bureau established Lincoln assassinated; Andrew Johnson succeeds him as president Johnson implements restoration plan Ex-Confederate states pass Black Codes to limit freedpeople’s rights



 Civil Rights Act passes over Johnson’s veto Major Republican gains in congressional elections



Reconstruction Act




Impeachment of Andrew Johnson
 Fourteenth Amendment ratified Ulysses S. Grant elected president



 Ku Klux Klan at peak of power Congress passes Enforcement Laws to suppress Klan Fifteenth Amendment ratified



 Grant reelected; Crédit Mobilier scandal emerges



 Panic of 1873 ushers in severe economic depression



 Sweeping Democratic gains in congressional elections



 Whiskey Ring and other scandals undermine Grant administration Minor v. Happersett: Supreme Court rules that Fourteenth Amendment does not extend voting rights to women



 Supreme Court severely curtails Reconstruction in U.S. v. Cruikshank



 Rutherford B. Hayes becomes president Reconstruction officially ends

KEY TURNING POINTS:
Identify two crucial turning points in the course of Reconstruction. 
 What caused those shifts in direction, and what were the results?





Conquering a Continent
1854–1890


C H A P T E R
THE REPUBLICAN VISION
The New Union and the World Integrating the National Economy 
INCORPORATING THE WEST
Mining Empires Cattlemen on the Plains Homesteaders The First National Park 
A HARVEST OF BLOOD: NATIVE PEOPLES DISPOSSESSED
The Civil War and Indians on the Plains Grant’s Peace Policy The End of Armed Resistance Strategies of Survival Western Myths and Realities 


O


 n May 10, 1869, Americans IDENTIFY THE BIG IDEA poured into the streets for a giant How did U.S. policymakers seek to party. In big cities, the racket was stimulate the economy and inteincredible. Cannons boomed and train grate the trans-Mississippi west into whistles shrilled. New York fired a hundredthe nation, and how did this affect gun salute at City Hall. Congregations sang people living there? anthems, while the less religious gathered in saloons to celebrate with whiskey. Philadelphia’s joyful throngs reminded an observer of the day, four years earlier, when news had arrived of Lee’s surrender. The festivities were prompted by a long-awaited telegraph message: executives of the Union Pacific and Central Pacific railroads had driven a golden spike at Promontory Point, Utah, linking up their lines. Unbroken track now stretched from the Atlantic to the Pacific. A journey across North America could be made in less than a week. The first transcontinental railroad meant jobs and money. San Francisco residents got right to business: after firing a salute, they loaded Japanese tea on a train bound for St. Louis, marking California’s first overland delivery to the East. In coming decades, trade and tourism fueled tremendous growth west of the Mississippi. San Francisco, which in 1860 had handled $7.4 million in imports, increased that figure to $49 million over thirty years. The new railroad would, as one speaker predicted in 1869, “populate our vast territory” and make America “the highway of nations.” The railroad was also a political triumph. Victorious in the Civil War, Republicans saw themselves as heirs to the American System envisioned by antebellum Whigs. They believed government intervention in the economy was the key to nation building. But unlike Whigs, whose plans had met stiff Democratic opposition, Republicans enjoyed a decade of unparalleled federal power. They used it vigorously: U.S. government spending per person, after skyrocketing in the Civil War, remained well above earlier levels. Republicans believed that national economic integration was the best guarantor of lasting peace. As a New York minister declared, the federally supported transcontinental railroad would “preserve the Union.” The minister was wrong on one point. He claimed the railroad was a peaceful achievement, in contrast to military battles that had brought “devastation, misery, and woe.” In fact, creating a continental empire caused plenty of woe. Regions west of the Mississippi could only be incorporated if the United States subdued native peoples and established favorable conditions for international investors — often at great domestic cost. And while conquering the West helped make the United States into an industrial power, it also deepened America’s rivalry with European empires and created new patterns of exploitation.

 The Great West In the wake of the Civil War, Americans looked westward. Republicans imple-

 mented an array of policies to foster economic development in the “Great West.” Ranchers, farmers, and lumbermen cast hungry eyes on the remaining lands held by Native Americans. Steamboats and railroads, both visible in the background of this image, became celebrated as symbols of the expanding reach of U.S. economic might. This 1881 promotional poster illustrates the bountiful natural resources to be found out west, as well as the land available for ranching, farming, and commerce. The men in the lower left corner are surveying land for sale. Library of Congress.





 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

The Republican Vision
 Reshaping the former Confederacy was only part of Republicans’ plan for a reconstructed nation. They remembered the era after Andrew Jackson’s destruction of the Second National Bank as one of economic chaos, when the United States had become vulnerable to international creditors and market fluctuations. Land speculation on the frontier had provoked extreme cycles of boom and bust. Failure to fund a transcontinental railroad had left different regions of the country disconnected. This, Republicans believed, had helped trigger the Civil War, and they were determined to set a new direction. Even while the war raged, Congress made vigorous use of federal power, launching the transcontinental rail project and a new national banking system. Congress also raised the protective tariff on a range of manufactured goods, EXPLAIN from textiles to steel, and on some CONSEQUENCES In what ways did Repubagricultural products, like wool licans use federal power and sugar. At federal customon the world stage, and houses in each port, foreign manin what ways did they ufacturers who brought merchancontinue policies from the dise into the United States had pre–Civil War era? to pay import fees. These tariff revenues gave U.S. manufacturers, who did not pay the fees, a competitive advantage in America’s vast domestic market. The economic depression that began in 1873 set limits on Republicans’ economic ambitions, just as it hindered their Reconstruction plans in the South. But their policies continued to shape the economy. Though some historians argue that the late nineteenth century was an era of laissez faire or unrestrained capitalism, in which government sat passively by, the industrial United States was actually the product of a massive public-private partnership in which government played critical roles.

The New Union and the World
 The United States emerged from the Civil War with new leverage in its negotiation with European countries, especially Great Britain, whose navy dominated the seas. Britain, which had allowed Confederate raiding ships such as CSS Alabama to be built in its shipyards, submitted afterward to arbitration and paid the United States $15.5 million in damages. Flush with victory, many Americans expected more British and Spanish territories to drop into the Union’s lap. Senator

 Charles Sumner proposed, in fact, that Britain settle the Alabama claims by handing over Canada. Such dreams were a logical extension of pre–Civil War conquests, especially in the Mexican War. With the coasts now linked by rail, merchants and manufacturers looked across the Pacific, hungry for trade with Asia. Americans had already established a dominant presence in Hawaii, where U.S. whalers and merchant ships stopped for food and repairs. With the advent of steam-powered vessels, both the U.S. Navy and private shippers wanted more refueling points in the Caribbean and Pacific. Even before the Civil War, these commercial aims had prompted the U.S. government to force Japan to open trade. For centuries, since unpleasant encounters with Portuguese traders in the 1600s, Japanese leaders had adhered to a policy of strict isolation. Americans, who wanted coal stations in Japan, argued that trade would extend what one missionary called “commerce, knowledge, and Christianity, with their multiplied blessings.” Whether or not Japan wanted these blessings was irrelevant. In 1854, Commodore Matthew Perry succeeded in getting Japanese officials to sign the Treaty of Kanagawa, allowing U.S. ships to refuel at two ports. By 1858, America and Japan had commenced trade, and a U.S. consul took up residence in Japan’s capital, Edo (now known as Tokyo). Union victory also increased U.S. economic influence in Latin America. While the United States was preoccupied with its internal war, France had deposed Mexico’s government and installed an emperor. On May 5, 1867, Mexico overthrew the French invaders and executed Emperor Maximilian. But while Mexico regained independence, it lay open to the economic designs of its increasingly powerful northern neighbor. A new model emerged for asserting U.S. power in Latin America and Asia: not by direct conquest, but through trade. The architect of this vision was William Seward, secretary of state from 1861 to 1869 under presidents Abraham Lincoln and Andrew Johnson. A New Yorker of grand ambition and ego, Seward believed, like many contemporaries, that Asia would become “the chief theatre of [world] events” and that commerce there was key to America’s prosperity. He urged the Senate to purchase sites in both the Pacific and the Caribbean for naval bases and refueling stations. When Japan changed policy and tried to close its ports to foreigners, Seward dispatched U.S. naval vessels to join those of Britain, France, and the Netherlands in reopening trade by force. At the same time, Seward urged annexation of Hawaii. He also predicted that the

 CHAPTER 16

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890


An American Merchant Ship in Yokohama Harbor, 1861
 After the United States forcibly “opened” Japan to foreign trade in 1854, American and European ships and visitors became a familiar sight in the port of Yokohama. In these 1861 prints — two panels of a five-panel series — artist Hashimoto Sadahide meticulously details activity in Yokohama Harbor. On the left, goods are carried onto an American merchant ship; on the right, two women dressed in Western style watch the arrival of another boat. In the background, a steamship flies the Dutch flag; a rowboat heading to or from another (unseen) ship carries the flag of France. Library of Congress.

 United States would one day claim the Philippines and build a Panama canal. Seward’s short-term achievements were modest. Exhausted by civil war, Americans had little enthusiasm for further military exploits. Seward achieved only two significant victories. In 1868, he secured congressional approval for the Burlingame Treaty with China, which guaranteed the rights of U.S. missionaries in China and set official terms for the emigration of Chinese laborers, some of whom were already clearing farmland and building railroads in the West. That same year, Seward negotiated the purchase of Alaska from Russia. After the Senate approved the deal, Seward waxed poetic: Our nation with united interests blest Not now content to poise, shall sway the rest; Abroad our empire shall no limits know, But like the sea in endless circles flow.

 Many Americans scoffed at the purchase of Alaska, a frigid arctic tract that skeptics nicknamed “Seward’s Icebox.” But the secretary of state mapped out a path

 his Republican successors would follow thirty years later in an aggressive bid for global power.

Integrating the National Economy
 Closer to home, Republicans focused on transportation infrastructure. Railroad development in the United States began well before the Civil War, with the first locomotives arriving from Britain in the early 1830s. Unlike canals or roads, railroads offered the promise of year-round, all-weather service. Locomotives could run in the dark and never needed to rest, except to take on coal and water. Steam engines crossed high mountains and rocky gorges where pack animals could find no fodder and canals could never reach. West of the Mississippi, railroads opened vast regions for farming, trade, and tourism. A transcontinental railroad executive was only half-joking when he said, “The West is purely a railroad enterprise.” Governments could choose to build and operate railroads themselves or promote construction by





 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

Building the Central Pacific
Railroad
 In 1865, Chinese workers had labored to build the 1,100-foot-long, 90-foothigh trestle over the divide between the American and Bear rivers at Secret Town in the Sierra Nevada Mountains. In 1877, the Chinese workers shown in this photograph by Carleton Watkins were again at work on the site, burying the trestle to avoid replacement of the aging timbers, which had become a fire hazard. University of California at Berkeley, Bancroft Library.

 private companies. Unlike most European countries, the United States chose the private approach. The federal government, however, provided essential loans, subsidies, and grants of public land. States and localities also lured railroads with offers of financial aid, mainly by buying railroad bonds. Without this aid, rail networks would have grown much more slowly and would probably have concentrated in urban regions. With it, railroads enjoyed an enormous — and reckless — boom. By 1900, virtually no corner of the country lacked rail service (Map 16.1). At the same time, U.S. railroads built across the border into Mexico (America Compared, p. 514). Railroad companies transformed American capitalism. They adopted a legal form of organization, the corporation, that enabled them to raise private capital in prodigious amounts. In earlier decades, state legislatures had chartered corporations for specific public purposes, binding these creations to government goals and oversight. But over the course of the nineteenth

 century, legislatures gradually began to allow any business to become a corporation by simply applying for a state charter. Among the first corporations to become large interstate enterprises, private railroads were much freer than earlier companies to do as they pleased. After the Civil War, they received lavish public aid with few strings attached. Their position was like that of American banks in late 2008 after the big federal bailout: even critics acknowledged that public aid to these giant companies was good for the economy, but they observed that it also lent government support to fabulous accumulations of private wealth.

 Tariffs and Economic Growth Along with the transformative power of railroads, Republicans’ protective tariffs helped build other U.S. industries, including textiles and steel in the Northeast and Midwest and, through tariffs on imported sugar and wool, sugar beet farming and sheep ranching in the West. Tariffs also funded government itself. In an era when the United States did

 CHAPTER 16

Pacific
Time
Zone


Mountain
Time
Zone


Seattle


C A N A D A
Central
Time
Zone
Eastern
Time
Zone


 uperior L. S

Portland


L.


Boston


 i nt a r L. OBuffalo

 o

L.
Michigan 

Chicago


 ron Hu

 MinneapolisSt. Paul

Salt
Lake
City




Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890


Detroit
L.


 ie Er

Cleveland


New York
Pittsburgh


Omaha
Denver


San Francisco


Cincinnati
Kansas
City


Washington,
D.C.


St. Louis


Memphis
Los Angeles


Atlanta


ATLANTIC OCEAN
Charleston 
Dallas


PACIFIC OCEAN

N


El Paso
New Orleans


 Railroad Growth between 1870 – 1890 Major rail lines in 1870 Major rail lines added 1870–1890

E


W


Gulf of Me x i co


 MEXICO



 400 miles

 400 kilometers

 MAP 16.1 Expansion of the Railroad System, 1870–1890 In 1860, the nation had 30,000 miles of rail track; by 1890, it had 167,000 miles. The tremendous burst of construction during the last twenty years of that period essentially completed the nation’s rail network, although there would be additional expansion for the next two decades. The main areas of growth were in the South and in lands west of the Mississippi. Time zones — introduced by the railroad companies in 1883 — are marked by the gray lines.

 not levy income taxes, tariffs provided the bulk of treasury revenue. The Civil War had left the Union with a staggering debt of $2.8 billion. Tariff income erased that debt and by the 1880s generated huge budget surpluses — a circumstance hard to imagine today. As Reconstruction faltered, tariffs came under political fire. Democrats argued that tariffs taxed American consumers by denying them access to lowcost imported goods and forcing them to pay subsidies to U.S. manufacturers. Republicans claimed, conversely, that tariffs benefitted workers because they created jobs, blocked low-wage foreign competition, and safeguarded America from the kind of industrial poverty that had arisen in Europe. According to this argument, tariffs helped American men earn enough to support their families; wives could devote themselves to homemaking, and children could go to school, not the

 factory. For protectionist Republicans, high tariffs were akin to the abolition of slavery: they protected and uplifted the most vulnerable workers. In these fierce debates, both sides were partly right. Protective tariffs did play a powerful role in economic growth. They helped transform the United States into a global industrial power. Eventually, though, even protectionist Republicans had to admit that Democrats had a point: tariffs had not prevented industrial poverty in the United States. Corporations accumulated massive benefits from tariffs but failed to pass them along to workers, who often toiled long hours for low wages. Furthermore, tariffs helped foster trusts, corporations that dominated whole sectors of the economy and wielded near-monopoly power. The rise of large private corporations and trusts generated enduring political problems.

S


AMERICA C O M PA R E D
This map, based on an 1885 traveler’s guide published by the Atchison, Topeka, and Santa Fe Railroad, includes the company’s U.S. lines and also those of its Mexican Central Railroad, an ATSF subsidiary that crossed the border and terminated at Guaymas and Mexico City, Mexico. The dots represent the many stops that the trains made along the routes between major cities. Most Mexican railroads in this era were built and operated by U.S. companies. As you analyze this map, consider how residents of the two countries may have experienced the railroad’s arrival in different ways. 
The Santa Fe Railroad
 in Mexico and the United States MAP 16.2

The Santa Fe Railroad System, 1885


QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS
Ogden 
Reno
Salt Lake City
Sacramento


Denver
Pueblo


Grand
Junction


San
Visalia
Francisco


Kansas
City


Dodge
City
Winslow


Los Angeles


Las Vegas, NM


San Diego


UNITED STATES

Tucson


 1. In what directions could passengers and freight travel on ATSF lines in each country? What does this suggest about the objectives of railroad companies like this one? 2. Based on this evidence, how might Mexicans have experienced the arrival of railroads differently from residents of the western United States?

El Paso


PACIFIC OCEAN

Chihuahua
Guaymas


 MEXICO

N
W


E


Gulf of
Mexico


S


Lines of the Sante Fe
 Railroad with Selected Stops Railroad stop





 300 miles

 300 kilometers Mexico City

 The Role of Courts While fostering growth, most historians agree, Republicans did not give government enough regulatory power over the new corporations. State legislatures did pass hundreds of regulatory laws after the Civil War, but interstate companies challenged them in federal courts. In Munn v. Illinois (1877), the Supreme Court affirmed that states could regulate key businesses, such as railroads and grain elevators, that were “clothed in the public interest.” However, the justices

 feared that too many state and local regulations would impede business and fragment the national marketplace. Starting in the 1870s, they interpreted the “due process” clause of the new Fourteenth Amendment — which dictated that no state could “deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law” — as shielding corporations from excessive regulation. Ironically, the Court refused to use the same amendment to protect the rights of African Americans.

 CHAPTER 16

 In the Southwest as well, federal courts promoted economic development at the expense of racial justice. Though the United States had taken control of New Mexico and Arizona after the Mexican War, much land remained afterward in the hands of Mexican farmers and ranchers. Many lived as peónes, under longstanding agreements with landowners who held large tracts originally granted by the Spanish crown. The post–Civil War years brought railroads and an influx of land-hungry Anglos. New Mexico’s governor reported indignantly that Mexican shepherds were often “asked” to leave their ranges “by a cowboy or cattle herder with a brace of pistols at his belt and a Winchester in his hands.” Existing land claims were so complex that Congress eventually set up a special court to rule on land titles. Between 1891 and 1904, the court invalidated most traditional claims, including those of many New Mexico ejidos, or villages owned collectively by their communities. Mexican Americans lost about 64 percent of the contested lands. In addition, much land was sold or appropriated through legal machinations like those of a notorious cabal of politicians and lawyers known as the Santa Fe Ring. The result was displacement of thousands of Mexican American villagers and farmers. Some found work as railroad builders or mine workers; others, moving into the sparse high country of the Sierras and Rockies where cattle could not survive, developed sheep raising into a major enterprise.

 Silver and Gold In an era of nation building, U.S. and European policymakers sought new ways to rationalize markets. Industrializing nations, for example, tried to develop an international system of standard measurements and even a unified currency. Though these proposals failed as each nation succumbed to self-interest, governments did increasingly agree that, for “scientific” reasons, money should be based on gold, which was thought to have an intrinsic worth above other metals. Great Britain had long held to the gold standard, meaning that paper notes from the Bank of England could be backed by gold held in the bank’s vaults. During the 1870s and 1880s, the United States, Germany, France, and other countries also converted to gold. Beforehand, these nations had been on a bimetallic standard: they issued both gold and silver coins, with respective weights fixed at a relative value. The United States switched to the gold standard in part because treasury officials and financiers were watching developments out west. Geologists accurately predicted the discovery of immense silver deposits, such as Nevada’s Comstock Lode, without comparable new gold strikes. A massive influx of silver would clearly upset the long-

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890




 standing ratio. Thus, with a law IDENTIFY CAUSES that became infamous to later What federal policies critics as the “Crime of 1873,” contributed to the rise Congress chose gold. It directed of America’s industrial the U.S. Treasury to cease minting economy, and what were silver dollars and, over a six- their results? year period, retire Civil War–era greenbacks (paper dollars) and replace them with notes from an expanded system of national banks. After this process was complete in 1879, the treasury exchanged these notes for gold on request. (Advocates of bimetallism did achieve one small victory: the Bland-Allison Act of 1878 required the U.S. Mint to coin a modest amount of silver.) By adopting the gold standard, Republican policymakers sharply limited the nation’s money supply, to the level of available gold. The amount of money circulating in the United States had been $30.35 per person in 1865; by 1880, it fell to only $19.36 per person. Today, few economists would sanction such a plan, especially for an economy growing at breakneck speed. They would recommend, instead, increasing money supplies to keep pace with development. But at the time, policymakers remembered rampant antebellum speculation and the hardships of inflation during the Civil War. The United States, as a developing country, also needed to attract investment capital from Britain, Belgium, and other European nations that were on the gold standard. Making it easy to exchange U.S. bonds and currency for gold encouraged European investors to send their money to the United States. Republican policies fostered exuberant growth and a breathtakingly rapid integration of the economy. Railroads and telegraphs tied the nation together. U.S. manufacturers amassed staggering amounts of capital and built corporations of national and even global scope. With its immense, integrated marketplace of workers, consumers, raw materials, and finished products, the United States was poised to become a mighty industrial power.

Incorporating the West
 Republicans wanted farms as well as factories. As early as 1860, popular lyrics hailed the advent of “Uncle Sam’s Farm”: A welcome, warm and hearty, do we give the sons of toil, To come west and settle and labor on Free Soil; We’ve room enough and land enough, they needn’t feel alarmed — Oh! Come to the land of Freedom and vote yourself a farm.



 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

 The Homestead Act (1862) gave 160 acres of federal land to any applicant who occupied and improved the property. Republicans hoped the bill would help build up the interior West, which was inhabited by Indian peoples but remained “empty” on U.S. government survey maps. Implementing this plan required innovative policies. The same year it passed the Homestead Act, Congress also created the federal Department of Agriculture and, through the Morrill Act, set aside 140 million federal acres that states could sell to raise money for public universities. The goal of these land-grant colleges was to broaden educational opportunities and foster technical and scientific expertise. After the Civil War, Congress also funded a series of geological surveys, dispatching U.S. Army officers, scientists, and photographers to chart unknown western terrain and catalog resources. To a large extent, these policies succeeded in incorporating lands west of the Mississippi. The United States began to exploit its western empire for minerals,

 lumber, and other raw materials. But for ordinary Americans who went west, dreams often outran reality. Well-financed corporations, not individual prospectors, reaped most of the profits from western mines, while the Great Plains environment proved resistant to ranching and farming.

Mining Empires
 In the late 1850s, as easy pickings in the California gold rush diminished, prospectors scattered in hopes of finding riches elsewhere. They found gold at many sites, including Nevada, the Colorado Rockies, and South Dakota’s Black Hills (Map 16.3). As news of each strike spread, remote areas turned overnight into mob scenes of prospectors, traders, prostitutes, and saloon keepers. At community meetings, white prospectors made their own laws, often using them as an instrument for excluding Mexicans, Chinese, and blacks. The silver from Nevada’s Comstock Lode, discovered in 1859, built the boomtown of Virginia City,

Hydraulic Mining
 When surface veins of gold played out, miners turned to hydraulic mining, the modern form of which was invented in California in 1853. The technology was simple, using high-pressure streams of water to wash away hillsides of gold-bearing soil. Although building the reservoirs, piping systems, and sluices cost money, the profits from hydraulic mining helped transform western mining into big business. But, as this daguerreotype suggests, the large scale on which hydraulic mining was done wreaked large-scale havoc on the environment. Collection of Matthew Isenburg.

 CHAPTER 16

 (after Francaviglia)

 % Coeur d’Alene

 WASHINGTON

MONTANA
Butte Florence OREGON 
Boise City
Silver City %1861


Virginia
City
Eureka
Coloma %1859
Austin
San
Aurora
Francisco
NEVADA
Mariposa CALIFORNIA 
N. DAK.

Virginia City


BLACK
Deadwood HILLS Custer City S. DAK. WYOMING 
 IDAHO

Weaverville


Helena


South Pass


Corinne


 NEBR.

Central
City Denver
UTAH
Leadville COLORADO TERRITORY 1876% Pike’s Peak Cripple Creede% Creek ARIZONA TERRITORY 
Los Angeles


Wickenburg


N
W


Tubac


E
S


NEW MEXICO TERRITORY
Santa 
% Rita


%Tombstone


TEXAS
Terlingua 
 Gold bonanza

 Gold mining (primarily)

 % Silver bonanza

 Intermontane region (gold, silver, copper, iron) Rocky Mountain region (gold, silver, lead, copper)





Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890


 federally owned land to work the claim and keep all the proceeds. (The law — including the $5-per-acre fee for filing a claim — remains in force today.) Americans idealized the notion of the lone, hardy mining prospector with his pan and his mule, but digging into deep veins of underground ore required big money. Consortiums of powerful investors, bringing engineers and advanced equipment, generally extracted the most wealth. This was the case for the New York trading firm Phelps Dodge, which invested in massive copper mines and smelting operations on both sides of the U.S.Mexico border. The mines created jobs in new towns like Bisbee and Morenci, Arizona — but with dangerous conditions and low pay, especially for those who received the segregated “Mexican wage.” Anglos, testified one Mexican mine worker, “occupied decorous residences . . . and had large amounts of money,” while “the Mexican population and its economic condition offered a pathetic contrast.” He protested this affront to “the most elemental principles of justice.” The rise of western mining created an insatiable market for timber and produce from the Pacific Northwest (Map 16.4). Seattle and Portland grew rapidly as

 500 miles 500 kilometers

 MAP 16.3

W


 which soon acquired fancy hotels, a Shakespearean theater, and even its own stock exchange. In 1870, a hundred saloons operated in Virginia City, brothels lined D Street, and men outnumbered women 2 to 1. In the 1880s, however, as the Comstock Lode played out, Virginia City suffered the fate of many mining camps: it became a ghost town. What remained was a ravaged landscape with mountains of debris, poisoned water sources, and surrounding lands stripped of timber. In hopes of encouraging development of western resources, Congress passed the General Mining Act of 1872, which allowed those who discovered minerals on

 WASHINGTON

E


S


Mining Frontiers, 1848–1890
 The Far West was America’s gold country because of its geological history. Veins of gold and silver form when molten material from the earth’s core is forced up into fissures caused by the tectonic movements that create mountain ranges, such as the ones that dominate the far western landscape. It was these veins, the product of mountain-forming activity many thousands of years earlier, that prospectors began to discover after 1848 and furiously exploit. Although widely dispersed across the Far West, the lodes that they found followed the mountain ranges bisecting the region and bypassing the great plateaus not shaped by the ancient tectonic activity.



N


Portland#


#


Los Angeles#


San Diego#






#


Spokane


E


Portland#
Salem#


#
San Francisco


 CALIFORNIA



#
Olympia# Seattle


 WASHINGTON

 OREGON

#


Sacramento


Sacramento




W
S


 OREGON

#
San Francisco


N


 400 miles

 400 kilometers

 CALIFORNIA

#


Los Angeles


Population Density #San Diego
 per Square Mile Under 2 2 to 6 6 to 18 18 to 45 45 to 90 Over 90

 MAP 16.4 Settlement of the Pacific Slope, 1860–1890 In 1860, the economic development of the Pacific slope was remarkably uneven — fully under way in northern California and scarcely begun anywhere else. By 1890, a new pattern had begun to emerge, with the swift growth of southern California foreshadowed and the Pacific Northwest incorporated into the regional and national economy.





 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

 supply centers, especially during the great gold rushes of California (after 1849) and the Klondike in Canada’s Yukon Territory (after 1897). Residents of Tacoma, Washington, claimed theirs was the “City of Destiny” when it became the Pacific terminus for the Northern Pacific, the nation’s third transcontinental railroad, in 1887. But rival businessmen in Seattle succeeded in promoting their city as the gateway to Alaska and the Klondike. Seattle, a town with 1,000 residents in 1870, grew over the next forty years to a population of a quarter million.

Cattlemen on the Plains
 While boomtowns arose across the West, hunters began transforming the plains. As late as the Civil War years, great herds of bison still roamed this region. But

Cowboys, Real and Mythic
 As early as the 1860s, popular dime novels such as this one (right) celebrated the alleged ruggedness, individual freedoms, and gun-slinging capabilities of western cowboys. (Note that this 1888 story, like most dime novels, was published in New York.) Generations of young Americans grew up on stories of frontier valor and “Cowboys versus Indians.” In fact, cowboys like the ones depicted in the photograph were really wageworkers on horseback. An ethnically diverse group, including many blacks and Hispanics, they earned perhaps $25 a month, plus meals and a bed in the bunkhouse, in return for long hours of grueling, lonesome work. Library of Congress; Denver Public Library/Bridgeman Art Library.

 overhunting and the introduction of European animal afflictions, like the bacterial disease brucellosis, were already decimating the herds. In the 1870s, hide hunters finished them off so thoroughly that at one point fewer than two hundred bison remained in U.S. territory. Hunters hidden downwind, under the right conditions, could kill four dozen at a time without moving from the spot. They took hides but left the meat to rot, an act of vast wastefulness that shocked native peoples. Removal of the bison opened opportunities for cattle ranchers. South Texas provided an early model for their ambitious plans. By the end of the Civil War, about five million head of longhorn cattle grazed on Anglo ranches there. In 1865, the Missouri Pacific Railroad reached Sedalia, Missouri, far enough west to be accessible as Texas reentered the Union. A longhorn worth $3 in Texas might command $40 at Sedalia.

 CHAPTER 16

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890


Advertisement for Silver Pine
 Healing Oil, c. 1880s Conquest of the Great Plains was made possible in part by the invention of barbed wire, which could cheaply enclose wide areas, even where trees and wood were scarce. Inventor Joseph Glidden received a patent in 1874 for the most familiar form of barbed wire. His wire proved durable, and Glidden invented machinery to mass-produce it — while his business associates skillfully promoted the product to farmers in the West. By 1880, Glidden’s company sold 80 million pounds of barbed wire a year. This image shows, however, that the new “thorny fence” also had a downside. Other businessmen profited by healing the injuries that barbed wire caused to valuable animals. Picture Research Consultants & Archives.

 With this incentive, ranchers inaugurated the Long Drive, hiring cowboys to herd cattle hundreds of miles north to the new rail lines, which soon extended into Kansas. At Abilene and Dodge City, Kansas, ranchers sold their longhorns and trail-weary cowboys crowded into saloons. These cow towns captured the nation’s imagination as symbols of the Wild West, but the reality was much less exciting. Cowboys, many of them African Americans and Latinos, were really farmhands on horseback who worked long, harsh hours for low pay. North of Texas, public grazing lands drew investors and adventurers eager for a taste of the West. By the early 1880s, as many as 7.5 million cattle were overgrazing the plains’ native grasses. A cycle of good weather postponed disaster, which arrived in 1886: record blizzards and bitter cold. An awful scene of rotting carcasses greeted cowboys as they rode onto the range that spring. Further hit by a severe drought the following summer, the cattle boom collapsed. Thanks to new strategies, however, cattle ranching survived and became part of the integrated national economy. As railroads reached Texas and ranchers there abandoned the Long Drive, the invention of barbed wire — which enabled ranchers and farmers to fence large areas cheaply and easily on the plains, where wood was scarce and expensive — made it easier for northern cattlemen to fence small areas and feed animals on hay. Stockyards appeared beside the rapidly

 extending railroad tracks, and trains took these gathered cattle to giant slaughterhouses in cities like Chicago, which turned them into cheap beef for customers back east.

Homesteaders
 Republicans envisioned the Great Plains dotted with small farms, but farmers had to be persuaded that crops would grow there. Powerful interests worked hard to overcome the popular idea that the grassland was the Great American Desert. Railroads, eager to sell land the government had granted them, advertised aggressively. Land speculators, transatlantic steamship lines, and western states and territories joined the campaign. Newcomers found the soil beneath the native prairie grasses deep and fertile. Steel plows enabled them to break through the tough roots, while barbed wire provided cheap, effective fencing against roaming cattle. European immigrants brought strains of hard-kernel wheat that tolerated the extreme temperatures of the plains. As if to confirm promoters’ optimism, a wet cycle occurred between 1878 and 1886, increasing rainfall in the arid regions east of the Rockies. Americans decided that “rain follows the plow”: settlement was increasing rainfall. Some attributed the rain to soil cultivation and tree planting, while others credited God. One Harvard professor proposed that





 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

Family on the L. W. Hall Farm,
Buffalo County, Nebraska,
 This family has moved from their original sod house into a new frame house. Perhaps they asked the photographer to include in his image the windmill, a key to their prosperity. Other photographs on this property, some taken in 1907, show thriving young trees and a woman proudly posed with her new hand-cranked washing machine. How might this family have responded to the argument, made in this textbook chapter and by some critics at the time, that farming was a failure on the arid Great Plains? What different story might they tell about their hardships and successes? Nebraska State Historical Society.

 steel railroad tracks attracted moisture. Such optimists would soon learn their mistake. The motivation for most settlers, American or immigrant, was to better themselves economically. Union veterans, who received favorable terms in staking homestead claims, played a major role in settling Kansas and other plains states. When severe depression hit northern Europe in the 1870s, Norwegians and Swedes joined German emigrants in large numbers. At the peak of “American fever” in 1882, more than 105,000 Scandinavians left for the United States. Swedish and Norwegian became the primary languages in parts of Minnesota and the Dakotas. For some African Americans, the plains represented a promised land of freedom. In 1879, a group of black communities left Mississippi and Louisiana in a quest to escape poverty and white violence. Some 6,000 blacks departed together, most carrying little but the clothes on their backs and faith in God. They called themselves Exodusters, participants in a great exodus to Kansas. The 1880 census reported 40,000 blacks there, by far the largest African American concentration in the West aside from Texas, where the expanding cotton frontier attracted hundreds of thousands of black migrants. For newcomers, taming the plains differed from pioneering in antebellum Iowa or Oregon. Dealers sold big new machines to help with plowing and harvesting.

 Western wheat traveled by rail to giant grain elevators and traded immediately on world markets. Hoping frontier land values would appreciate rapidly, many farmers planned to profit from selling acres as much as (or more than) from their crops. In boom times, many rushed into debt to acquire more land and better equipment. All these enthusiasms — for cash crops, land speculation, borrowed money, and new technology — bore witness to the conviction that farming was, as one agricultural journal remarked, a business “like all other business.”

 Women in the West Early miners, lumbermen, and cowboys were overwhelmingly male, but homesteading was a family affair. The success of a farm depended on the work of wives and children who tended the garden and animals, preserved food, and helped out at harvest time. Some women struck out on their own: a study of North Dakota found between 5 and 20 percent of homestead claims filed by single women, often working land adjacent to that of sisters, brothers, and parents. Family members thus supported one another in the difficult work of farming, while easing the loneliness many newcomers felt. Looking back with pride on her homesteading days, one Dakota woman said simply, “It was a place to stay and it was mine.” While promoting farms in the West, Republicans clashed with the distinctive religious group that had

 CHAPTER 16

 already settled Utah: Mormons, or members of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS). After suffering persecution in Missouri and Illinois, Mormons had moved west to Utah in the 1840s, attracting many working-class converts from England as well. Most Americans at the time were deeply hostile to Mormonism, especially the LDS practice of plural marriage — sanctioned by church founder Joseph Smith — through which some Mormon men married more than one wife. Mormons had their own complex view of women’s role, illustrated by the career of Mormon leader Emmeline Wells. Born in New Hampshire, Emmeline converted to Mormonism at age thirteen along with her mother and joined the exodus to Utah in 1848. After her first husband abandoned her when he left the church, Emmeline became the seventh wife of church elder Daniel Wells. In 1870, due in part to organized pressure from Wells and other Mormon women, the Utah legislature granted full voting rights to women, becoming the second U.S. territory to do so (after Wyoming, in 1869). The measure increased LDS control, since most Utah women were Mormons, while non-Mormons in mining camps were predominantly male. It also recognized the central role of women in Mormon life. Amid the constitutional debates of Reconstruction, polygamy and women’s voting rights became intertwined issues (American Voices, p. 522). Encouraged by other plural wives, Emmeline Wells began in 1877 to write for a Salt Lake City newspaper, the Woman’s Exponent. She served as editor for forty years and led local women’s rights groups. At first, Utah’s legislature blocked Wells’s candidacy in a local election, based on her sex. But when Utah won statehood in 1896, Wells had the pleasure of watching several women win seats in the new legislature, including Dr. Martha Hughes Cannon, a physician and Mormon plural wife who became the first American woman to serve in a state senate. Like their counterparts in other western states, Utah’s women experienced a combination of severe frontier hardships and striking new opportunities.

 Environmental Challenges Homesteaders faced a host of challenges, particularly the natural environment of the Great Plains. Clouds of grasshoppers could descend and destroy a crop in a day; a prairie fire or hailstorm could do the job in an hour. In spring, homesteaders faced sudden, terrifying tornados, while their winter experiences in the 1870s added the word blizzard to America’s vocabulary. On the plains, also, water and lumber were hard to find. Newly arrived families

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890




 often cut dugouts into hillsides COMPARE AND and then, after a season or two, CONTRAST erected houses made of turf cut Compare the development from the ground. of mining, ranching, and Over the long term, home- farming in the West. How steaders discovered that the west- did their environmental ern grasslands did not receive consequences differ? enough rain to grow wheat and other grains. As the cycle of rainfall shifted from wet to dry, farmers as well as ranchers suffered. “A wind hot as an oven’s fury . . . raged like a pestilence,” reported one Nebraskan, leaving “farmers helpless, with no weapon against this terrible and inscrutable wrath of nature.” By the late 1880s, some recently settled lands emptied as homesteaders fled in defeat — 50,000 from the Dakotas alone. It became obvious that farming in the arid West required methods other than those used east of the Mississippi. Clearly, 160-acre homesteads were the wrong size for the West: farmers needed either small irrigated plots or immense tracts for dry farming, which involved deep planting to bring subsoil moisture to the roots and quick harrowing after rainfalls to slow evaporation. Dry farming developed most fully on huge corporate farms in the Red River Valley of North Dakota. But even family farms, the norm elsewhere, could not survive on less than 300 acres of grain. Crop prices were too low, and the climate too unpredictable, to allow farmers to get by on less. In this struggle, settlers regarded themselves as nature’s conquerors, striving, as one pioneer remarked, “to get the land subdued and the wilde nature out of it.” Much about its “wilde nature” was hidden to the newcomers. They did not know that destroying biodiversity, which was what farming the plains really meant, opened pathways for exotic, destructive pests and weeds, and that removing native grasses left the soil vulnerable to erosion. By the turn of the twentieth century, about half the nation’s cattle and sheep, one-third of its cereal crops, and nearly three-fifths of its wheat came from the Great Plains. But in the drier parts of the region, it was not a sustainable achievement. This renowned breadbasket was later revealed to be, in the words of one historian, “the largest, longest-run agricultural and environmental miscalculation in American history.” John Wesley Powell, a one-armed Union veteran, predicted the catastrophe from an early date. Powell, employed by the new U.S. Geological Survey, led a famous expedition in the West in which his team navigated the rapids of the Colorado River through the Grand Canyon in wooden boats. In his Report on the

AMERICAN VOICES

 Women’s Rights in the West

 In 1870, Utah’s territorial legislature granted voting rights to women. The decision was a shock to advocates of women’s suffrage in the East: they expected their first big victories would come in New England. Furthermore, Utah was overwhelmingly peopled by Mormons — members of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS). Critics saw Mormonism as a harshly patriarchal religion. They especially loathed the Mormon practice of “plural marriage,” in which some Mormon men took more than one wife. Most easterners thought this practice was barbaric and demeaning to women. Over the next two decades, Republicans pressured Mormons to abolish plural marriage. They also disenfranchised Mormon women and required men to take an anti-polygamy oath; Congress refused to admit Utah as a state. Only after 1890, when the LDS church officially abolished plural marriage, was Utah statehood possible. In 1896, when Utah became a state, women’s voting rights were finally reinstated.

Fanny Stenhouse


 Exposé of Polygamy: A Lady’s Life Among the Mormons (1872) An Englishwoman who converted to the faith and moved to Utah, Stenhouse became disillusioned and published her book to criticize the practice of Mormon polygamy.

 How little do the Mormon men of Utah know what it is, in the truest sense, to have a wife, though they have so many “wives,” after their own fashion. Almost imperceptibly to the husband, and even the wife herself, a barrier rises between them the very day that he marries another woman. It matters not how much she believes in the doctrine of plural marriages, or how willing she may be to submit to it; the fact remains the same. The estrangement begins by her trying to hide from him all secret sorrow; for she feels that what has been can not be undone now, and she says, “I cannot change it; neither would I if I could, because it is the will of God, and I must bear it; besides, what good will it do to worry my husband with all my feelings?” . . . A man may have a dozen wives; but from the whole of them combined he will not receive as much real love and devotion as he might from one alone, if he had made her feel that she had his undivided affection and confidence. How terribly these men deceive themselves! When peace, or rather quiet, reigns in their homes, they think that the spirit of God is there. But it is not so! It is a calm, not like the gentle silence of sleep, but as the horrible stillness of death — the death of the heart’s best affections, and all that is worth calling love. All true love has fled, and indifference has taken its place. The very children feel it. What do they — what can they care about their fathers? They seldom see them.

 Whatever, in the providence of God, may be the action of Congress toward Utah, if the word of a feeble woman can be listened to, let me respectfully ask the Honorable Senators and Representatives of the United States that, in the abolition of Polygamy, if such should be the decree of the nation, let no compromise be made where subtlety can bind the woman now living in Polygamy to remain in that condition. Source: Exposé of Polygamy: A Lady’s Life Among the Mormons, ed. Linda Wilcox DeSimone (Logan: Utah State University Press, 2008), 72–73, 155.

Eliza Snow, Harriet Cook Young, Phoebe Woodruff


A
Defense of Plural Marriage  The vast majority of Mormon women defended their faith and the practice of plural marriage. The statements by Eliza Snow, Harriet Cook Young, and Phoebe Woodruff, below, were made at a public protest meeting in Salt Lake City in 1870. LDS women pointed proudly to their new suffrage rights as proof of their religion’s just treatment of women. Why did Mormons, who dominated the Utah legislature, give women full voting rights? In part, they sought to protect their church by increasing Mormon voting power: most of the non-Mormons were single men who worked on ranches or in mining camps. But the LDS Church also celebrated women’s central role in the family and community. Some women achieved prominence as midwives, teachers, and professionals.

 Eliza Snow: Our enemies pretend that, in Utah, woman is held in a state of vassalage — that she does not act from choice, but by coercion — that we would even prefer life elsewhere, were it possible for us to make our escape. What nonsense! We all know that if we wished we could

 leave at any time — either go singly, or to rise en masse, and there is no power here that could, or would wish to, prevent us. I will now ask this assemblage of intelligent ladies, do you know of anyplace on the face of the earth, where woman has more liberty, and where she enjoys such high and glorious privileges as she does here, as a latter-day saint? No! The very idea of woman here in a state of slavery is a burlesque on good common sense. Harriet Cook Young: Wherever monogamy reigns, adultery, prostitution and foeticide, directly or indirectly, are its concomitants. . . . The women of Utah comprehend this; and they see, in the principle of plurality of wives, the only safeguard against adultery, prostitution, and the reckless waste of pre-natal life, practiced throughout the land. Phoebe Woodruff: God has revealed unto us the law of the patriarchal order of marriage, and commanded us to obey it. We are sealed to our husbands for time and eternity, that we may dwell with them and our children in the world to come; which guarantees unto us the greatest blessing for which we are created. If the rulers of the nation will so far depart from the spirit and letter of our glorious constitution as to deprive our prophets, apostles and elders of citizenship, and imprison them for obeying this law, let them grant this, our last request, to make their prisons large enough to hold their wives, for where they go we will go also. Source: Edward W. Tullidge, Women of Mormondom (New York: Tullidge & Crandall, 1877), 390–391, 396, 400.

 tried to change the debate to focus on the vulnerability of all married women to exploitation by their husbands. Her report from Utah, published in her journal The Revolution, is below.

 Woman’s work in monogamy and polygamy is essentially one and the same — that of planting her feet on the solid ground of self-support; . . . there is and can be no salvation for womanhood but in the possession of power over her own subsistence. The saddest feature here is that there really is nothing by which these women can earn an independent livelihood for themselves and children. No manufacturing establishments; no free schools to teach. Women here, as everywhere, must be able to live honestly and honorably without men, before it can be possible to save the masses of them from entering into polygamy or prostitution, legal or illegal. Whichever way I turn, whatever phase of social life presents itself, the same conclusion comes — independent bread alone can redeem woman from her sure subjection to man. . . . Here is missionary ground. Not for “thus saith the Lord,” divine rights, canting priests, or echoing priestesses of any sect whatsoever; but for great, god-like, humanitarian men and women, who “feel for them in bonds as bound with them,” . . . a simple, loving, sisterly clasp of hands with these struggling women, and an earnest work with them. Not to modify nor ameliorate, but to ABOLISH the whole system of woman’s subjection to man in both polygamy and monogamy. Source: The Revolution, July 20, 1871.

Susan B. Anthony


Letter to The Revolution, July 5, 1871
 National women’s suffrage leaders responded awkwardly to the Utah suffrage victory. Being associated with Mormons, they understood, damaged their fragile new movement in the eyes of most Americans. But they tried tentatively to forge alliances with Mormon women they viewed as progressive, as well as dissidents in the church. Suffrage leader Susan B. Anthony traveled to Salt Lake City in 1871 to try to forge alliances with Mormon women, especially dissidents such as Fanny Stenhouse. Anthony expressed strong disapproval of polygamy, but she also

QUESTIONS FOR ANALYSIS 1.
What arguments did the Mormon women make in defense of plural marriage? On what grounds did Stenhouse argue for its abolition? 2. Susan B. Anthony’s letter was published in Boston. How might Mormon women have reacted to it? How might non-Mormon women have reacted to the statements by Snow, Young, and Woodruff? 3. Compare the experiences of plural marriage described by Stenhouse, on the one hand, and Snow, Young, and Woodruff, on the other. How do you account for these very different perspectives? 




 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

Lands of the Arid Region of the United States (1879),
 Powell told Congress bluntly that 160-acre homesteads would not work in dry regions. Impressed with the success of Mormon irrigation projects in Utah, Powell urged the United States to follow their model. He proposed that the government develop the West’s water resources, building dams and canals and organizing landowners into local districts to operate them. Doubting that rugged individualism would succeed in the West, Powell proposed massive cooperation under government control. After heated debate, Congress rejected Powell’s plan. Critics accused him of playing into the hands of large ranching corporations; boosters were not yet willing to give up the dream of small homesteads. But Powell turned out to be right. Though environmental historians do not always agree with Powell’s IDENTIFY CAUSES proposed solutions, they point to What factors led to the his Report on Arid Lands as a creation of the first cogent critique of what went national parks? wrong on the Great Plains. Later,

 federal funding paid for dams and canals that supported intensive agriculture in many parts of the West.

The First National Park
 Powell was not the only one rethinking land use. The West’s incorporation into the national marketplace occurred with such speed that some Americans began to fear rampant overdevelopment. Perhaps the federal government should not sell off all its public land, but instead hold and manage some of it. Amid the heady initiatives of Reconstruction, Congress began to preserve sites of unusual natural splendor. As early as 1864, Congress gave 10 square miles of the Yosemite Valley to California for “public use, resort, and recreation.” (In 1890, Yosemite reverted to federal control.) In 1872, it set aside 2 million acres of Wyoming’s Yellowstone Valley as the world’s first national park: preserved as a public holding, it would serve as “a public park or pleasuring ground for the benefit and enjoyment of the people.”

The Yo-Hamite Falls, 1855
 This is one of the earliest artistic renderings of the Yosemite Valley, drawn, in fact, before the place came to be called Yosemite. The scale of the waterfall, which drops 2,300 feet to the valley below, is dramatized by artist Thomas A. Ayres’s companions in the foreground. In this romantic lithograph, one can already see the grandeur of the West that Yosemite came to represent for Americans. University of California at Berkeley, Bancroft Library.

 CHAPTER 16

 Railroad tourism, which developed side by side with other western industries, was an important motive for the creation of Yellowstone National Park. The Northern Pacific Railroad lobbied Congress vigorously to get the park established. Soon, luxury Pullman cars ushered visitors to Yellowstone’s hotel, operated by the railroad itself. But creation of the park was fraught with complications. Since no one knew exactly what a “national park” was or how to operate it, the U.S. Army was dispatched to take charge; only in the early 1900s, when Congress established many more parks in the West, did consistent management policies emerge. In the meantime, soldiers spent much of their time arresting native peoples who sought to hunt on Yellowstone lands. The creation of Yellowstone was an important step toward an ethic of respect for land and wildlife. So was the 1871 creation of a U.S. Fisheries Commission, which made recommendations to stem the decline in wild fish; by the 1930s, it merged with other federal wildlife bureaus to become the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service. At the same time, eviction of Indians showed that defining small preserves of “uninhabited wilderness” was part of conquest itself. In 1877, for example, the federal government forcibly removed the Nez Perce tribe from their ancestral land in what is now Idaho, Washington, and Oregon. Under the leadership of young Chief Joseph, the Nez Perces tried to flee to Canada. After a journey of 1,100 miles, they were forced to surrender just short of the border. During their trek, five bands crossed Yellowstone; as a Nez Perce named Yellow Wolf recalled, they “knew that

Killing the Bison
 This woodcut shows passengers shooting bison from a Kansas Pacific Railroad train — a small thrill added to the modern convenience of traveling west by rail. By the end of the 1870s, the plains bison shown here, which once numbered in the tens of millions and had been a large part of the Plains Indians’ way of life, had been hunted almost to extinction. North Wind Picture Archives.

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890


 country well.” For thirteen days, Nez Perce men raided the valley for supplies, waylaying several groups of tourists. The conflict made national headlines. Easterners, proud of their new “pleasuring ground,” were startled to find that it remained a site of native resistance. Americans were not settling an empty West. They were unsettling it by taking it from native peoples who already lived there.

A
Harvest of Blood: Native Peoples Dispossessed
 Before the Civil War, when most Americans believed the prairie could not be farmed, Congress reserved the Great Plains for Indian peoples. But in the era of steel plows and railroads, policymakers suddenly had the power and desire to incorporate the whole region. The U.S. Army fought against the loosely federated Sioux — the major power on the northern grasslands — as well as other peoples who had agreed to live on reservations but found conditions so desperate that they fled (Map 16.5). These “reservation wars,” caused largely by local violence and confused federal policies, were messy and bitter. Pointing to failed military campaigns, army atrocities, and egregious corruption in the Indian Bureau, reformers called for new policies that would destroy native people’s traditional lifeways and “civilize” them — or, as one reformer put it, “kill the Indian and save the man.”



 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

C A NA DA
 QUINAULT

SALISH COLVILLE WASH. CHINOOK YAKIMA CAYUSE

HUIA YUROK MAIDU POMO

PACIFIC O CEA N

 CALIF.

 CROW

NEZ PERCÉ

CHUMASH HAVASUPAI MOHAVE ARIZ. TERR. YUMA





 MINN.

Arkansa s R .


 NAVAJO

 SERRANO



 CHIPPEWA

 SIOUX

 200 miles

 HOPI

 APACHE

 PIMA

OSAGE CHEROKEE INDIAN TERR. COMANCHE CREEK SEMINOLE TAOS
Red River War CHOCTAW 1874-75 PUEBLO CHICKASAW N. MEX. Red R. TERR. KIOWA 
 ZUÑI

 100 200 kilometers

Indian-Ceded Lands


 TONKAWA

Skeleton Canyon
 (Geronimo surrenders), 1886

Before 1850


 ARK.

Mis
 siss ipp i R .

E


M


MONT.
Little Big Horn, 1876 MANDAN 
CHIPPEWA WIS. M ARIKARA
in BLACK HILLS MENOMINEE ne s ot S. DAK. Fetterman IDAHO a R Dakota Sioux Massacre, 1866 . WINNEBAGO Bozeman SIOUX Uprising, 1862 Trail . SIOUX R CHEYENNE Wounded Knee Sn a ke Massacre, 1890 IOWA WYO. PAIUTE IOWA SHOSHONE NEB. SAUK Great AND FOX P l a tt e R . Salt ARAPAHO ILL. NEV. Lake UTE PAWNEE COLO. UTAH Sand Creek o KANS. ad Massacre, 1864 PAIUTE or MO. APACHE CHEYENNE 
WALLA WALLA UMPQUA COOS ORE.

S


N. DAK.

 Chief Joseph’s Route

R.


W


 bia R.

 BLACKFEET

 i R. our iss

Co l u m


N


Bear Paw Mtn.
 (Chief Joseph surrenders), 1877

Co
 l



 MISS.

CADDO LA.

 TEXAS

 APACHE

1850–1870
 an Gr Rio

1870–1890


 Tribal locations reflect situation in the 1840s

 de

Reservations, 1890
 Selected battles

 MEXICO

Gulf of Mexico


 MAP 16.5 Indian Country in the West, to 1890 As settlement pushed onto the Great Plains after the Civil War, native peoples put up bitter resistance but ultimately to no avail. Over a period of decades, they ceded most of their lands to the federal government, and by 1890 they were confined to scattered reservations.

The Civil War and Indians on the Plains
 In August 1862, the attention of most Unionists and Confederates was riveted on General George McClellan’s failing campaign in Virginia. But in Minnesota, the Dakota Sioux were increasingly frustrated. In 1858, the year Minnesota secured statehood, they had agreed to settle on a strip of land reserved by the government, in exchange for receiving regular payments and supplies. But Indian agents, contractors, and even Minnesota’s territorial governor pocketed most of the funds. When the Dakotas protested that their children were starving, state officials dismissed their appeals. Corruption was so egregious that one

 leading Minnesotan, Episcopal bishop Henry Whipple, wrote an urgent appeal to President James Buchanan. “A nation which sows robbery,” he warned, “will reap a harvest of blood.” Whipple’s prediction proved correct. During the summer of 1862, a decade of anger boiled over. In a surprise attack, Dakota fighters fanned out through the Minnesota countryside, killing immigrants and burning farms. They planned to sweep eastward to St. Paul but were stopped at Fort Ridgely. In the end, more than four hundred whites lay dead, including women and children from farms and small towns. Thousands fled; panicked officials telegraphed for aid, spreading hysteria from Wisconsin to Colorado.

 CHAPTER 16

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890




Enclosed Dakota Camp at Fort Snelling, Minnesota, 1862
 During the trial of Dakota warriors involved in the 1862 rebellion, and through the harsh Minnesota winter that followed, more than a thousand members of the tribe were imprisoned in an enormous enclosure on Pike Island, near St. Paul. A measles epidemic broke out in the crowded camp and dozens died, especially children. Though U.S. soldiers were often unfriendly toward their captives, local sentiment was even more hostile; troops regularly marched through the camp, in part to protect the Dakotas from vigilante violence. In 1863 all members of the tribe were forcibly removed from the state. In November 1862, photographer Benjamin Franklin Upton captured this image of Dakota tents in the Pike Island enclosure. Minnesota Historical Society.

 Minnesotans’ ferocious response to the uprising set the stage for further conflict. A hastily appointed military court, bent on revenge, sentenced 307 Dakotas to death, making it clear that rebellious Indians would be treated as criminals rather than warriors. President Abraham Lincoln reviewed the trial records and commuted most of the sentences but authorized the deaths of 38 Dakota men. They were hanged just after Christmas 1862 in the largest mass execution in U.S. history. Two months later, Congress canceled all treaties with the Dakotas, revoked their annuities, and expelled them from Minnesota. The scattered bands fled west to join nonreservation allies. As the uprising showed, the Civil War created two dangerous conditions in the West, compounding the problems already caused by corruption. With the Union army fighting the Confederacy, western whites felt vulnerable to Indian attacks. They also discovered they could fight Indians with minimal federal oversight. In the wake of the Dakota uprising, worried Coloradans favored a military campaign against the Cheyennes — allies of the Sioux — even though the Cheyennes had shown little evidence of hostility. Colorado militia leader John M. Chivington, an aspiring politician, determined to quell public anxiety and make his career.

 In May 1864, Cheyenne chief IDENTIFY CAUSES Black Kettle, fearing his band What factors led to would be attacked, consulted with warfare between whites U.S. agents, who instructed him and native peoples on the to settle along Sand Creek in east- plains? ern Colorado until a treaty could be signed. On November 29, 1864, Chivington’s Colorado militia attacked the camp while most of the men were out hunting, slaughtering more than a hundred women and children. “I killed all I could,” one officer testified later. “I think and earnestly believe the Indian to be an obstacle to civilization and should be exterminated.” Captain Silas Soule, who served under Chivington but refused to give his men the order to fire, dissented. “It was hard to see little children on their knees,” he wrote later, “having their brains beat out by men professing to be civilized.” Chivington’s men rode back for a celebration in Denver, where they hung Cheyenne scalps (and women’s genitals) from the rafters of the Apollo Theater. The northern plains exploded in conflict. Infuriated by the Sand Creek massacre, Cheyennes carried war pipes to the Arapahos and Sioux, who attacked and burned white settlements along the South Platte River. Ordered to subdue these peoples, the U.S. Army failed



 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

 miserably: officers could not even locate the enemy, who traveled rapidly in small bands and knew the country well. A further shock occurred in December 1866 when 1,500 Sioux warriors executed a perfect ambush, luring Captain William Fetterman and 80 soldiers from a Wyoming fort and wiping them out. With the Fetterman massacre, the Sioux succeeded in closing the Bozeman Trail, a private road under army protection that had served as the main route into Montana. General William Tecumseh Sherman, now commanding the army in the West, swore to defeat defiant Indians. But the Union hero met his match on the plains. Another year of fighting proved expensive and inconclusive. In 1868, the Sioux, led by the Oglala band under Chief Red Cloud, told a peace commission they would not sign any treaty unless the United States pledged to abandon all its forts along the Bozeman Trail. The commission agreed. Red Cloud had won. In the wake of these events, eastern public opinion turned against the Indian wars, which seemed at best ineffective, at worst brutal. Congress held hearings on the slaughter at Sand Creek. Though Chivington, now a civilian, was never prosecuted, the massacre became an infamous example of western vigilantism. By the time Ulysses Grant entered the White House in 1869, the authors of Reconstruction in the South also began to seek solutions to what they called the “Indian problem.”

 Grant’s Peace Policy Grant inherited an Indian policy in disarray. Federal incompetence was highlighted by yet another mass killing of friendly Indians in January 1870, this time on the Marias River in Montana, by an army detachment that shot and burned to death 173 Piegans (Blackfeet). Having run out of other options, Grant introduced a peace policy, based on recommendations from Christian advisors. He offered selected appointments to the reformers — including many former abolitionists — who had created such groups as the Indian Rights Association and the Women’s National Indian Association. Rejecting the virulent anti-Indian stance of many westerners, reformers argued that native peoples had the innate capacity to become equal with whites. They believed, however, that Indians could achieve this only if they embraced Christianity and white ways. Reformers thus aimed to destroy native languages, cultures, and religions. Despite humane intentions, their condescension was obvious. They ignored dissenters like Dr. Thomas Bland of the National Indian Defense

 Association, who suggested that instead of an “Indian problem” there might be a “white problem” — refusal to permit Indians to follow their own lifeways. To most nineteenth-century Americans, such a notion was shocking and uncivilized. Increasingly dismissive of blacks’ capacity for citizenship and hostile toward “heathen” Chinese immigrants, white Americans were even less willing to understand and respect Indian cultures. They believed that in the modern world, native peoples were fated for extinction (Thinking Like a Historian, p. 530).

 Indian Boarding Schools Reformers focused their greatest energy on educating the next generation. Realizing that acculturation — adoption of white ways — was difficult when children lived at home, agents and missionaries created off-reservation schools. Native families were exhorted, bullied, and bribed into sending their children to these schools, where, in addition to school lessons, boys learned farming skills and girls practiced housekeeping. “English only” was the rule; students were punished if they spoke their own languages. Mourning Dove, a Salish girl from what is now Washington State, remembered that her school “ran strictly. We never talked during meals without permission, given only on Sunday or special holidays. Otherwise there was silence — a terrible silent silence. I was used to the freedom of the forest, and it was hard to learn this strict discipline. I was punished many times before I learned.” The Lakota boy Plenty Kill, who at boarding school received the new name Luther, remembered his loneliness and fear upon arrival: “The big boys would sing brave songs, and that would start the girls to crying. . . . The girls’ quarters were about a hundred and fifty yards from ours, so we could hear them.” After having his hair cut short, Plenty Kill felt a profound change in his identity. “None of us slept well that night,” he recalled. “I felt that I was no more Indian, but would be an imitation of a white man.” To see a longer excerpt of Mourning Dove’s autobiography, along with other primary sources from this period, see Sources for America’s History.

 Even in the first flush of reform zeal, Grant’s policies faced major hurdles. Most Indians had been pushed off traditional lands and assigned to barren ground that would have defeated the most enterprising farmer. Poverty and dislocation left Indians especially vulnerable to the ravages of infectious diseases like measles and scarlet fever. At the same time, Quaker, Presbyterian, and Methodist reformers fought turf

 CHAPTER 16

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890




 Red Cloud’s Bedroom, 1891 Taken on the Pine Ridge Reservation in South Dakota by photographer C. G. Morledge, this photograph shows the bedroom of Red Cloud, a distinguished Oglala Lakota leader. Red Cloud had won a war against the U.S. Army just after the Civil War. He negotiated so tenaciously and shrewdly, afterward, with what he saw as meddlesome Indian agents, that his people nicknamed Pine Ridge “The Place Where Everything Is Disputed.” Some of the contents of Red Cloud’s bedroom may surprise you. How do you interpret the presence of five American flags? The visual images on the walls? What strategies and ways of life, blending old and new, does the photograph suggest? Compare it to Edward S. Curtis, “Little Plume and Yellow Kidney” (p. 533). In what ways did Morledge and Curtis craft different representations of Indian life? Denver Public Library/Bridgeman Art Library.

 battles among themselves and with Catholic missionaries. Many traders and agents also continued to steal money and supplies from people they were supposed to protect. In the late 1870s, Rutherford B. Hayes’s administration undertook more housecleaning at the Bureau of Indian Affairs, but corruption lingered. From the Indians’ point of view, reformers often became just another interest group in a crowded field of whites sending hopelessly mixed messages. The attitudes of individual army representatives, agents, and missionaries ranged from courageous and sympathetic to utterly ruthless. Many times, after chiefs thought they had reached a face-to-face agreement, they found it drastically altered by Congress or Washington bureaucrats. Nez Perce leader Joseph observed that “white people have too many chiefs. They do not understand each other. . . . I cannot understand why so

 many chiefs are allowed to talk so UNDERSTAND many different ways, and promise POINTS OF VIEW so many different things.” A How did post–Civil War Kiowa chief agreed: “We make reformers believe they but few contracts, and them we were improving U.S. Indian remember well. The whites make policies, and in what ways so many they are liable to forget did that prove to be true them. The white chief seems not and untrue? to be able to govern his braves.” Native peoples were nonetheless forced to accommodate, as independent tribal governance and treaty making came to an end. Back in the 1830s, the U.S. Supreme Court had declared Indians no longer sovereign but rather “domestic dependent nations.” On a practical basis, however, both the U.S. Senate and agents in the field continued to negotiate treaties as late as 1869. Two years later, the House of Representatives,

THINKING LIKE A HISTORIAN
Representing Indians 
 The documents below, designed for white audiences, all depict American Indians in the West.

 1. Buffalo Bill Cody’s Wild West advertisement, 1899. Cody never called the Wild West a “show,” placing tremendous emphasis on its allegedly authentic reenactments of events.

Superstock.


2. Lewis Henry Morgan, Ancient Society, 1877.
 Morgan, a leading American anthropologist, studied the Iroquois and other native peoples. In 1877 he published an influential theory of human development, ranking various peoples in their “progress” from the “lowest stage of savagery” through the pinnacle of “civilization” — northern Europeans.

 Some tribes and families have been left in geographical isolation to work out the problems of progress. . . . [Others] have been adulterated through external influence. Thus, while Africa was and is an ethnical chaos of savagery and barbarism, Australia and Polynesia were in savagery, pure and simple. . . . The Indian family of America, unlike any other existing family, exemplified the condition of mankind in three successive ethnical

 TABLE 16.1 Status of Civilization (from Morgan, Ancient Society, 1877) I. Lower Status of Savagery

 From the Infancy of the Human Race to the commencement of the next Period.

II.
Middle Status of Savagery 
 From the acquisition of a fish subsistence and a knowledge of the use of fire . . .

III.
Upper Status of Savagery 
From the Invention of the Bow and Arrow . . .


IV.
Lower Status of Barbarism 
From the Invention of the Art of Pottery . . .


V.
Middle Status of Barbarism 

 From the Domestication of animals on the Eastern hemisphere, and in the Western from the cultivation of maize and plants by Irrigation . . .

VI.
Upper Status of Barbarism 
 From the Invention of the process of Smelting Iron Ore, with the use of iron tools . . .

VII.
Civilization 
 From the Invention of writing, to the present time.



 periods. . . . The far northern Indians and some of the coast tribes of North and South America were in the Upper Status of savagery; the partially Village Indians east of the Mississippi were in the Lower Status of barbarism, and the Village Indians of North and South America were in the Middle Status. . . . Commencing, then, with the Australians and Polynesians, following with the American Indian tribes, and concluding with the Roman and Grecian, who afford the highest exemplifications respectively of the six great stages of human progress, the sum of their united experiences may be supposed fairly to represent that of the human family. . . . We are dealing substantially, with the ancient history and condition of our own remote ancestors.

 Flatheads are a success. It would be a matter of surprise to some people who think that the only good Indian is a dead Indian, to see the way some of the women handle sewing machines. Sources: (2) Lewis H. Morgan, Ancient Society (New York: Henry Holt and Company, 1878), 12–13, 16–18; (3) John Hyde, Wonderland (St. Paul, 1888), 21, and 1894, 27.

 4. Gertrude Käsebier, photograph of Joe Black Fox, 1898. One of the first women to become a professional photographer, Käsebier here depicts Joe Black Fox relaxing with a cigarette. Black Fox, an Oglala Sioux, toured with Buffalo Bill’s Wild West in 1900.

3. Touring Indian Country, 1888 and 1894. Hoping to
 lure eastern tourists, the Northern Pacific Railroad published an annual journal, Wonderland, describing the natural splendors and economic progress of the West, as seen from its rail lines.

 We are now in the far-famed Yellowstone Valley. . . . There are but few Indians now to be seen along the line of the railroad, and those are engaged in agricultural and industrial pursuits. The extinction of the buffalo has rendered the Indian much more amenable to the civilizing influences brought to bear upon him than he formerly was, and very fair crops of grain are being raised at some of the agencies. At the Devil’s Lake agency, for example, 60,000 bushels of wheat have been raised by the [Sioux and Chippewa] Indians in a single season. . . . [The Crows’] great reservation is probably the garden spot of Montana, and the throwing open of a large portion of it to [white] settlement, which cannot long be delayed, will assuredly give an immense impetus to the agricultural interests of the Territory. . . . The Flatheads have probably 10,000 or more horses and 5,000 or 6,000 cattle. . . . As ranchers and farmers the ANALYZING THE EVIDENCE 1. Compare the depiction of the Plains Indians and Buffalo Bill Cody in source 1. How does source 4 differ from source 1? From Edward Curtis’s “In a Piegan Lodge” (p. 533), in which all traces of modern life were erased? How might these depictions of “actual life” have shaped their audience’s understanding of the West? 2. What bases did Morgan use for his rankings in source 2? How did he define the relationship between American Indians and whites (whom he refers to, in this passage, as “we”)? Why did he suggest that Indians offered a unique opportunity for study? 3. Imagine that you were a wealthy, well-educated tourist preparing to travel west in 1900. Which of these documents would you most likely have encountered in advance? How might they have shaped your expectations and experiences?

Photographic History Collection, National Museum of American
History, Smithsonian Institution 69.236.22, 2004-57801


 4. These documents had different creators: an artist, a scholar, and two sets of entrepreneurs. What audiences did they have in mind? How do you think this affected their messages?

PUTTING IT ALL TOGETHER
Many nineteenth-century commentators claimed that American Indians were “vanishing”: that is, they could not adapt to modernity and would die out. This proved untrue, of course, but the idea circulated widely. Which of these sources lend support to the idea of the “vanishing Indian”? Which suggest counter-stories of survival and endurance? Using these sources and your knowledge of the period, analyze the myths and realities of Native American life in the late nineteenth century. 




 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

 jealous of Senate privileges, passed a bill to abolish all treaty making with Indians. The Senate agreed, provided that existing treaties remained in force. It was one more step in a long, torturous erosion of native rights. Eventually, the U.S. Supreme Court ruled in Lone Wolf v. Hitchcock (1903) that Congress could make whatever Indian policies it chose, ignoring all existing treaties. That same year, in Ex Parte Crow Dog, the Court ruled that no Indian was a citizen unless Congress designated him so. Indians were henceforth wards of the government. These rulings remained in force until the New Deal of the 1930s.

 Breaking Up Tribal Lands Reformers’ most sweeping effort to assimilate Indians was the Dawes Severalty Act (1887), the dream of Senator Henry L. Dawes of Massachusetts, a leader in the Indian Rights Association. Dawes saw the reservation system as an ugly relic of the past. Through severalty — division of tribal lands — he hoped to force Indians onto individual landholdings, partitioning reservations into homesteads, just like those of white farmers. Supporters of the plan believed that landownership would encourage Indians to assimilate. It would lead, as Dawes wrote, to “a personal sense of independence.” Individual property, echoed another reformer, would make the Indian man “intelligently selfish, . . . with a pocket that aches to be filled with dollars! ” The Dawes Act was a disaster. It played into the hands of whites who coveted Indian land and who persuaded the government to sell them land that was not needed for individual allotments. In this and other ways, the Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) implemented the law carelessly, to the outrage of Dawes. In Indian Territory, a commission seized more than 15 million “surplus” acres from native tribes by 1894, opening the way for whites to convert the last federal territory set aside for native peoples into the state of Oklahoma. In addition to catastrophic losses of collectively held property, native peoples lost 66 percent of their individually allotted lands between the 1880s and the 1930s, through fraud, BIA mismanagement, and pressure to sell to whites.

The End of Armed Resistance
 As the nation consolidated control of the West in the 1870s, Americans hoped that Grant’s peace policy was solving the “Indian problem.” In the Southwest, such formidable peoples as the Kiowas and Comanches had been forced onto reservations. The Diné or Navajo nation, exiled under horrific conditions during the

 Civil War but permitted to reoccupy their traditional land, gave up further military resistance. An outbreak among California’s Modoc people in 1873 — again, humiliating to the army — was at last subdued. Only Sitting Bull, a leader of the powerful Lakota Sioux on the northern plains, openly refused to go to a reservation. When pressured by U.S. troops, he repeatedly crossed into Canada, where he told reporters that “the life of white men is slavery. . . . I have seen nothing that a white man has, houses or railways or clothing or food, that is as good as the right to move in open country and live in our own fashion.” In 1874, the Lakotas faced direct provocation. Lieutenant Colonel George Armstrong Custer, a brash self-promoter who had graduated last in his class at West Point, led an expedition into South Dakota’s Black Hills and loudly proclaimed the discovery of gold. Amid the severe depression of the 1870s, prospectors rushed in. The United States, wavering on its 1868 treaty, pressured Sioux leaders to sell the Black Hills. The chiefs said no. Ignoring this answer, the government demanded in 1876 that all Sioux gather at the federal agencies. The policy backfired: not only did Sitting Bull refuse to report, but other Sioux, Cheyennes, and Arapahos slipped away from reservations to join him. Knowing they might face military attack, they agreed to live together for the summer in one great village numbering over seven thousand people. By June, they were camped on the Little Big Horn River in what is now southeastern Montana. Some of the young men wanted to organize raiding parties, but elders counseled against it. “We [are] within our treaty rights as hunters,” they argued. “We must keep ourselves so.” The U.S. Army dispatched a thousand cavalry and infantrymen to drive the Indians back to the reservation. Despite warnings from experienced scouts — including Crow Indian allies — most officers thought the job would be easy. Their greatest fear was that the Indians would manage to slip away. But amid the nation’s centennial celebration on the Fourth of July 1876, Americans received dreadful news. On June 26 and 27, Lieutenant Colonel Custer, leading the 7th Cavalry as part of a three-pronged effort to surround the Indians, had led 210 men in an ill-considered assault on Sitting Bull’s camp. The Sioux and their allies had killed the attackers to the last man. “The Indians,” one Oglala woman remembered, “acted just like they were driving buffalo to a good place where they could be easily slaughtered.” As retold by the press in sensational (and often fictionalized) accounts, the story of Custer’s “last stand” quickly served to justify American conquest of Indian

 CHAPTER 16

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890




Little Plume and Yellow Kidney
 Photographer Edward S. Curtis took this photograph of the Piegan (Blackfeet) leader Little Plume and his son Yellow Kidney. Curtis’s extensive collection of photographs of Native Americans remains a valuable resource for historians. However, Curtis altered his images to make his native subjects seem more “authentic”: though Indians made widespread use of nonnative furniture, clothes, and other consumer goods (such as Singer sewing machines), Curtis removed those from the frame. He also retouched photographs to remove items such as belts and watches. Note the circular “shadow” here, against the lodge wall, near Little Plume’s right arm: the original photograph included a clock. Library of Congress.

 “savages.” Long after Americans forgot the massacres of Cheyenne women and children at Sand Creek and of Piegan people on the Marias River, prints of the Battle of Little Big Horn hung in barrooms across the country. William F. “Buffalo Bill” Cody, in his traveling Wild West performances, enacted a revenge killing of a Cheyenne man named Yellow Hand in a tableau Cody called “first scalp for Custer.” Notwithstanding that the tableau featured a white man scalping a Cheyenne, Cody depicted it as a triumph for civilization. Little Big Horn proved to be the last military victory of Plains Indians against the U.S. Army. Pursued relentlessly after Custer’s death and finding fewer and fewer bison to sustain them, Sioux parents watched their children starve through a bitter winter. Slowly, families trickled into the agencies and accommodated themselves to reservation life (Map 16.6). The next year,

 the Nez Perces, fleeing for the EXPLAIN Canadian border, also surrendered. CONSEQUENCES The final holdouts fought in the How did Grant’s peace Southwest with Chiricahua Apache policy fail to consider the leader Geronimo. Like many oth- needs of Native Americans ers, Geronimo had accepted res- in the West, and what ervation life but found conditions were its results? unendurable. Describing the desolate land the tribe had been allotted, one Apache said it had “nothing but cactus, rattlesnakes, heat, rocks, and insects. . . . Many, many of our people died of starvation.” When Geronimo took up arms in protest, the army recruited other Apaches to track him and his band into the hills; in September 1886, he surrendered for the last time. The Chiricahua Apaches never returned to their homeland. The United States had completed its military conquest of the West.



 PART 5

CREATING AND PRESERVING A CONTINENTAL NATION, 1844–1877

Standing Rock
Agency




Cheyenne River
Agency


GREAT SIOUX RESERVATION
Missouri R . 
Spotted Tail Agency
Red Cloud Agency
Standing Rock
Agency




Cheyenne River
Agency


GREAT SIOUX RESERVATION
Pine Ridge Agency 
Rosebud
Agency


Missouri R
.


Standing Rock
Reservation


Sisseton
Reservation


Cheyenne River
Reservation


Crow Creek
Reservation


Lower Brulé
Reservation
Pine Ridge Rosebud
Reservation Reservation
' Wounded Knee


 Present-day state boundaries are shown.

Yankton
Reservation
Missouri R
.


Santee
Reservation


 MAP 16.6 The Sioux Reservations in South Dakota, 1868–1889 In 1868, when they bent to the demand that they move onto the reservation, the Sioux thought they had gained secure rights to a substantial part of their ancestral hunting grounds. But harsh conditions on reservations led to continuing military conflicts. Landhungry whites exerted continuous local pressure, and officials in Washington repeatedly changed the terms of Sioux land holdings — always eroding native claims.

Strategies of Survival
 Though the warpath closed, many native peoples continued secretly to practice traditional customs. Away from the disapproving eyes of TRACE CHANGE agents and teachers, they passed OVER TIME on their languages, histories, and In what ways did the traditional arts and medicine to outlook of native peoples younger generations. Frustrated change in the era after missionaries often concluded that armed resistance had little could be accomplished ended? because bonds of kinship and

 custom were so strong. Parents also hated to relinquish their children to off-reservation boarding schools. Thus more and more Indian schools ended up on or near reservations; white teachers had to accept their pupils’ continued participation in the rhythms of Indian community life. Selectively, most native peoples adopted some white ways. Many parents urged their sons and daughters to study hard, learn English, and develop skills to help them succeed in the new world they confronted. Even Sitting Bull announced in 1885 that he wanted his children “to be educated like the white children are.” Some Indian students grew up to be lawyers, doctors, and advocates for their people, including writers and artists who interpreted native experiences for national audiences. One of the most famous was a Santee Sioux boy named Ohiyesa, who became Dr. Charles Eastman. Posted to the Pine Ridge Reservation in South Dakota, Eastman practiced medicine side by side with traditional healers, whom he respected, and wrote popular books under his Sioux name. He remembered that when he left for boarding school, his father had said, “We have now entered upon this life, and there is no going back. . . . Remember, my boy, it is the same as if I sent you on your first war-path. I shall expect you to conquer.” Nothing exemplified this syncretism, or cultural blending, better than the Ghost Dance movement of the late 1880s and early 1890s, which fostered native peoples’ hope that they could, through sacred dances, resurrect the bison and call a great storm to drive whites back across the Atlantic. The Ghost Dance drew on Christian elements as well as native ones. As the movement spread from reservation to reservation — Paiutes, Arapahos, Sioux — native peoples developed new forms of pan-Indian identity and cooperation. White responses to the Ghost Dance showed continued misunderstanding and lethal exertion of authority. In 1890, when a group of Lakota Sioux Ghost Dancers left their South Dakota reservation, they were pursued by the U.S. Army, who feared that further spread of the religion would provoke war. On December 29, at Wounded Knee, the 7th Cavalry caught up with fleeing Lakotas and killed at least 150 — perhaps as many as 300. Like other massacres, this one could have been avoided. The deaths at Wounded Knee stand as a final indictment of decades of relentless U.S. expansion, white ignorance and greed, chaotic and conflicting policies, and bloody mistakes.

 CHAPTER 16

Western Myths and Realities
 The post–Civil War frontier produced mythic figures who have played starring roles in America’s national folklore ever since: “savage” Indians, brave pioneers, rugged cowboys, and gun-slinging sheriffs. Far from being invented by Hollywood in the twentieth century, these oversimplified characters emerged in the era when the nation incorporated the West. Pioneers helped develop the mythic ideal. As one Montana woman claimed, they had come west “at peril of their lives” and faced down “scalp dances” and other terrors; in the end, they “conquered the wilderness and transformed it into a land of peace and plenty.” Some former cowboys, capitalizing on the popularity of dime novel Westerns, spiced up their memoirs for sale. Eastern readers were eager for stories like The Life and Adventures of Nat Love (1907), written by a Texas cowhand who had been born in slavery in Tennessee and who, as a rodeo star in the 1870s, had won the nickname “Deadwood Dick.” No myth-maker proved more influential than Buffalo Bill Cody. Unlike those who saw the West as free or empty, Bill understood that the United States had taken it by conquest. Ironically, his famous Wild West, which he insisted was not a “show” but an authentic representation of frontier experience, provided one of the few employment options for Plains Indians. To escape harsh reservation conditions, Sioux and Cheyenne men signed on with Bill and demonstrated their riding skills for cheering audiences across the United States and Europe, chasing buffalo and attacking U.S. soldiers and pioneer wagons in the arena. Buffalo Bill proved to be a good employer. Black Elk, a Sioux man who joined Cody’s operation, recalled that Bill was generous and “had a strong heart.” But Black Elk had a mixed reaction to the Wild West. “I liked the part of the show we made,” he told an interviewer, “but not the part the Wasichus [white people] made.” As he observed, the Wild West of the 1880s was at its heart a celebration of U.S. military conquest. At this same moment of transition, a young historian named Frederick Jackson Turner reviewed recent census data and proclaimed the end of the frontier. Up to 1890, he wrote, a clear, westward-moving line had existed between “civilization and savagery.” The frontier experience, Turner argued, shaped Americans’ national character. It left them a heritage of “coarseness and strength, combined with acuteness and inquisitiveness,” as well as “restless, nervous energy.” Today, historians reject Turner’s depiction of Indian “savagery” — and his contradictory idea that white

Conquering a Continent, 1854–1890


 pioneers in the West claimed empty “free land.” Many scholars have noted that frontier conquest was both violent and incomplete. The Dust Bowl of the 1930s, as well as more recent cycles of drought, have repeated late-nineteenth-century patterns of hardship and depopulation on the plains. During the 1950s and 1960s, also, uranium mining rushes in the West mimicked earlier patterns of boom and bust, leaving ghost towns in their wake. Turner himself acknowledged that the frontier had both good and evil elements. He noted that in the West, “frontier liberty was sometimes confused with absence of all effective government.” But in 1893, when Turner first published “The Significance of the Frontier in American History,” eager listeners heard only the positives. They saw pioneering in the West as evidence of American exceptionalism: of the nation’s unique history and destiny. They claimed that “peaceful” American expansion was the opposite of European empires — ignoring the many military and economic similarities. Although politically the American West became a set of states rather than a colony, historians today emphasize the legacy of conquest that is central to its (and America’s) history. Less than two months after the massacre at Wounded Knee, General William T. Sherman died in New York. As the nation marked his passing with pomp and oratory, commentators noted that his career reflected a great era of conquest and consolidation of national power. Known primarily for his role in defeating the Confederacy, Sherman’s first military exploits had been against Seminoles in Florida. Later, during the Mexican War (1846–1848), he had gone west with the U.S. Army to help claim California. After the Civil War, the general went west again, supervising the forced removal of Sioux and Cheyennes to reservations. When Sherman graduated from West Point in 1840, the United States had counted twenty-six states, none of them west of Missouri. At his death in 1891, the nation boasted forty-four states, stretching to the Pacific coast. The United States now rivaled Britain and Germany as an industrial giant, and its dynamic economy was drawing immigrants from around the world. Over the span of Sherman’s career, the United States had become a major player on the world stage. It had done so through the kind of fierce military conquest that Sherman made famous, as well as through bold expansions of federal authority to foster economic expansion. From the wars and policies of Sherman’s lifetime, the children and grandchildren of Civil War heroes inherited a vast empire. In the coming decades, it would be up to them to decide how they would use the nation’s new power.





 PART 5

CHAPTER REVIEW

SUMMARY
Between 1861 and 1877, the United States completed its conquest of the continent. After the Civil War, expansion of railroads fostered integration of the national economy. Republican policymakers promoted this integration through protective tariffs, while federal court rulings facilitated economic growth and strengthened corporations. To attract foreign investment, Congress placed the nation on the gold standard. Federal officials also pursued a vigorous foreign policy, acquiring Alaska and asserting U.S. power indirectly through control of international trade in Latin America and Asia. An important result of economic integration was incorporation of the Great Plains. Cattlemen built an industry linked to the integrated economy, in the process nearly driving the native bison to extinction. Homesteaders confronted harsh environmental conditions as they converted the grasslands for agriculture. Republicans championed homesteader families as 
C H A P T E R


 representatives of domesticity, an ideal opposed to Mormon plural marriage in Utah. Homesteading accelerated the rapid, often violent, transformation of western environments. Perceiving this transformation, federal officials began setting aside natural preserves such as Yellowstone, often clashing with Native Americans who wished to hunt there. Conflicts led to the dispossession of Native American lands. During the Civil War, whites clashed with the Sioux and their allies. Grant’s peace policy sought to end this conflict by forcing Native Americans to acculturate to European-style practices. Indian armed resistance continued through the 1880s, ending with Geronimo’s surrender in 1886. Thereafter, Native Americans survived by secretly continuing their traditions and selectively adopting white ways. Due in part to the determined military conquest of this period, the United States claimed a major role on the world stage. Frontier myths shaped Americans’ view of themselves as rugged individualists with a unique national destiny.

R E V I E W


M A K E I T S T I C K
Go to LearningCurve to retain what you’ve read. 
TERMS TO KNOW

 Identify and explain the significance of each term below.

Key Concepts and Events
 transcontinental railroad (p. 508) protective tariff (p. 510) Treaty of Kanagawa (p. 510) Burlingame Treaty (p. 511) Munn v. Illinois (p. 514) gold standard (p. 515) Crime of 1873 (p. 515) Homestead Act (p. 516) Morrill Act (p. 516) land-grant colleges (p. 516) Comstock Lode (p. 516) Long Drive (p. 519) “rain follows the plow” (p. 519)

Key People
Exodusters (p. 520)
Yellowstone National Park
U.S.
Fisheries Commission (p. 525) Sand Creek massacre (p. 527) Fetterman massacre (p. 528) Lone Wolf v. Hitchcock (p. 532) Dawes Severalty Act (p. 532) Battle of Little Big Horn (p. 533) Ghost Dance movement (p. 534) Wounded Knee (p. 534) 
William Seward (p. 510)
Emmeline Wells (p. 521)
John Wesley Powell (p. 521)
Chief Joseph (p. 525)
Sitting Bull (p. 532)
George Armstrong Custer
 (p. 532) Geronimo (p. 533) Ohiyesa (Dr. Charles Eastman) (p. 534) Buffalo Bill Cody (p. 535) Frederick Jackson Turner (p. 535)

 CHAPTER 16

CHAPTER REVIEW

REVIEW QUESTIONS
Answer these questions to demonstrate your understanding of the chapter’s main ideas. 
 1. What national policies did Republicans pursue

 during the Civil War and Reconstruction to stimulate economic growth and consolidate a continental empire? What were the resulting achievements and costs?

 2. How did the trans-Mississippi west develop eco-

 nomically in this era? What problems and conflicts resulted?

 3. Why did U.S. policies toward Native Americans in

 this era result in so much violence? Why did armed

MAKING CONNECTIONS

THEMATIC UNDERSTANDING
Review the 
 events listed under “Peopling” on the thematic timeline on page 409. Between the 1840s and the 1870s, what distinctive patterns of racial and ethnic conflict occurred along the northeastern seaboard and in the West? What were the results for immigrants in the Northeast, and for different ethnic and racial groups in the West?

 Recognize the larger developments and continuities within and across chapters by answering these questions.

ACROSS TIME AND PLACE
During the 
 Reconstruction years, Republican policymakers made sweeping policy decisions — especially having to do with land rights, voting rights, and education — that shaped the future of African Americans in the South and American Indians in the West. In an essay, compare U.S. policies toward the two groups. What assumptions and goals underlay each effort to incorporate racial minorities into the United States? To what extent did each effort succeed or fail, and why? How did the actions of powerful whites in each region shape the results?

MORE TO EXPLORE

 struggle continue as late as 1890, despite the U.S. “peace policy” that was proclaimed in the 1870s?

 Review the images in this chapter. Find two that show how Americans of the era thought the landscapes of the West ought to look when settlement was complete. Identify at least three others that show what the natural and built environments of the West really looked like. What do you conclude from this comparison about the ambitions and limits of westward expansion?

VISUAL EVIDENCE

 Start here to learn more about the events discussed in this chapter.

David Wallace Adams, Education for Extinction
 (1995). A powerful history of American Indian boarding schools. American Experience (PBS), “Last Stand at Little Big Horn.” A nuanced one-hour documentary about the famous battle. Sarah Barringer Gordon, The Mormon Question (2002). An exploration of plural marriage debates in national politics. Joy S. Kasson, Buffalo Bill’s Wild West (2001). A wonderful study of Buffalo Bill’s performances and their role in shaping mythologies of the West.

Patricia Nelson Limerick, The Legacy of Conquest
 (1987) and Something in the Soil (2000). Limerick’s lively, accessible books are an excellent introduction to historians’ recent rethinking of western history. María Montoya, Translating Property (2002). Tells the story of the displacement of Mexican Americans (and their neighbors) in struggles over the Maxwell Land Grant in New Mexico and Colorado.





 PART 5

CHAPTER REVIEW

 TIMELINE

 Ask yourself why this chapter begins and ends with these dates and then identify the links among related events.



 United States “opens” Japan to trade



 Comstock silver lode discovered in Nevada



Homestead Act
 Dakota Sioux uprising in Minnesota Morrill Act funds public state universities



 Sand Creek massacre of Cheyennes in Colorado Yosemite Valley reserved as public park



 Long Drive of Texas longhorns begins



 Fetterman massacre



 Burlingame Treaty with China



 Transcontinental railroad completed Wyoming women’s suffrage



 Utah women’s suffrage



General Mining Act
 Yellowstone National Park created



 United States begins move to gold standard



Battle of Little Big Horn




 Nez Perces forcibly removed from ancestral homelands in Northwest Munn v. Illinois Supreme Court decision



 Exoduster migration to Kansas John Wesley Powell presents Report on the Lands of the Arid Region of the United States

 1880s

 Rise of the Ghost Dance movement



 Sitting Bull tours with Buffalo Bill’s Wild West



 Dry cycle begins on the plains Chiricahua Apache leader Geronimo surrenders



Dawes Severalty Act




Massacre of Sioux Ghost Dancers at Wounded Knee, South Dakota


 CHAPTER 16

CHAPTER REVIEW

KEY TURNING POINTS:
The military, political, and economic events of the Civil War years (1861–1865) are often treated as largely occurring in the Northeast and South — at places such as Shiloh, Gettysburg, and Washington, D.C. What impact did these developments have on the West, and what were their legacies? 




P A R T


C H A P T E R 17


Industrial America:
Corporations and
Conflicts, 1877–1911
C H A P T E R 18


The Victorians
Make the Modern,
1880–1917
C H A P T E R 19


 “Civilization’s Inferno”: The Rise and Reform of Industrial Cities, 1880–1917 C H A P T E R 20

Whose Government?
Politics, Populists,
 and Progressives, 1880–1917

Industrializing
America: Upheavals
 and Experiments 1877–1917 Touring the United States around 1900, a Hungarian Catholic abbot named Count Péter Vay visited the steel mills of Pittsburgh. “Fourteenthousand tall chimneys . . . discharge their burning sparks and smoke incessantly,” he reported. He was moved by the plight of fellow Hungarians, laboring “wherever the heat is most insupportable, the flames most scorching.” One worker had just been killed in a foundry accident. Vay, attending the funeral, worried that immigration was “of no use except to help fill the moneybags of the insatiable millionaires.” Vay witnessed America’s emergence as an industrial power — and the consequences of that transformation. In 1877, the United States was overwhelmingly rural and dependent on foreign capital. By 1917, its landscapes, population, and ways of life were forever altered. Industrialization brought millions of immigrants from around the globe and built immense cities whose governance and social relations offered unaccustomed rewards and challenges. It sharpened class divisions and led to the rise of national labor movements, while prompting Americans to redefine men’s and women’s roles. Industrialization also created pressure for political innovation. As ex-president Theodore Roosevelt declared in 1910, American citizens needed to “control the mighty commercial forces which they have called into being.” Workers, farmers, and urban reformers sought to regulate corporations, fight poverty, and clean up politics and the environment. In their creative responses to the problems of the industrial age, such reformers gave their name to the Progressive Era.



Corporations and Conflicts


A
Diverse, Urban Society 

